Indiana, session 2026, SB86.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-24-1-2.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.81-2019,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. "Authorizer" means, for a charter school, one
(1) of the following:
(1) Subject to IC 20-24-2.2-1.2, a governing body.
(2) A state educational institution that offers a four (4) year
baccalaureate degree.
(3) (2) The executive (as defined in IC 36-1-2-5) of a consolidated
city.
(4) The charter board.
(5) Subject to IC 20-24-2.2-1.2, a governing board of a nonprofit
college or university that provides a four (4) year educational
program for which it awards a baccalaureate or more advanced
degree, including the following:
Anderson University
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


Bethel University
Butler University
Calumet College of St. Joseph
DePauw University
Earlham College
Franklin College
Goshen College
Grace College
Hanover College
Holy Cross College
Huntington University
Indiana Tech
Indiana Wesleyan University
Manchester University
Marian University
Martin University
Oakland City University
Rose-Hulman Institute of Technology
Saint Mary-of-the-Woods College
Saint Mary's College
Taylor University
Trine University
University of Evansville
University of Indianapolis
University of Notre Dame
University of Saint Francis
Valparaiso University
Wabash College.
SECTION 2. IC 20-24-2.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 69, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The Indiana charter school board is
established for the purpose of authorizing approving the
authorization of charter schools throughout Indiana.
(b) The charter board is a statewide charter school authorizer board
composed of the following nine (9) members appointed to four (4) year
terms:
(1) Four (4) members appointed by the governor. Not more than
two (2) members appointed under this subdivision may be
members of the same political party.
(2) One (1) member who has previous experience with or on
behalf of charter schools appointed by the secretary of education.
(3) Four (4) members, who may not be legislators, appointed as
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate.
(B) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of the
senate.
(C) One (1) member appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(D) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives.
A member appointed under this subsection may not be removed by the
member's appointing authority without cause before the end of the full
four (4) year term.
(c) The governor shall appoint the chairperson of the charter board.
(d) A majority of the members appointed to the charter board
constitutes a quorum. The affirmative votes of a majority of the
members present are required for the charter board to take action.
(e) Each member of the charter board who is not a state employee
is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement for
traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses
actually incurred in connection with the member's duties as provided
in the state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
(f) Members appointed to the charter board must collectively
possess strong experience and expertise in:
(1) public and nonprofit governance;
(2) management;
(3) finance;
(4) public school leadership;
(5) higher education;
(6) school assessments, curriculum, and instruction; and
(7) public education law.
SECTION 3. IC 20-24-2.1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.139-2022,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The charter board shall establish a process to:
(1) review a proposal to establish a charter school under
IC 20-24-3-4; and
(2) make a decision on the proposal as required under
IC 20-24-3-9.
(3) monitor charter schools authorized by the charter board; and
(4) make decisions on the renewal, nonrenewal, and revocation of
charters granted by the charter board.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


SECTION 4. IC 20-24-2.2-1.2, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.2. (a) This section applies to an authorizer
described in IC 20-24-1-2.5(1) and IC 20-24-1-2.5(2) and
IC 20-24-1-2.5(5) if the authorizer has not previously issued a charter
for any charter school prior to July 1, 2015.
(b) A governing body of a school corporation may register with the
state board for charter authority within the attendance area of the
school corporation. The state board shall post on the state board's
Internet web site website an application received from an authorizer to
register with the state board under this section within ten (10) days
after receipt of the application. The state board may not charge an
authorizer a fee to register with the state board under this section.
(c) A governing board of a nonprofit college or university described
in IC 20-24-1-2.5(5) may apply to the state board for statewide,
regional, or local chartering authority.
(d) (c) The state board shall publicize to all governing bodies the
opportunity to register with the state board for chartering authority
within their school corporation. Not later than May 1 of each year, the
state board shall provide information about the opportunity, including
a registration deadline, to all governing bodies. To register as an
authorizer, each interested governing body must submit the following
information in a format prescribed by the state board:
(1) A written notification of intent to serve as a charter authorizer
in accordance with this article.
(2) An explanation of the governing body's strategic vision for
chartering.
(3) An explanation of the governing body's budget and personnel
capacity and commitment to execute the duties of quality charter
authorizing in accordance with this article.
(4) An explanation of how the governing body will solicit charter
school applicants in accordance with IC 20-24-3.
(5) A description or outline of the performance framework the
governing body will use to guide the establishment of a charter
contract and for the oversight and evaluation of charter schools,
consistent with this article.
(6) A draft of the governing body's renewal, revocation, and
nonrenewal processes, consistent with this article.
(7) A statement of assurance that the governing body commits to
serving as a charter authorizer in fulfillment of the expectations,
spirit, and intent of this article, and that the governing body will
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


fully adopt standards of quality charter school authorizing in
accordance with section 1.5 of this chapter.
(e) (d) Within sixty (60) days of receipt of the information described
in subsection (d), (c), the state board shall register the governing body
as a charter authorizer within the attendance area of the school
corporation and shall provide the governing body a letter confirming
the governing body's registration as a charter authorizer. A governing
body may not engage in any charter authorizing functions without a
current registration as a charter authorizer with the state board.
(f) The state board shall establish an annual application and
approval process, including cycles and deadlines during the state fiscal
year, for registering an entity described in IC 20-24-1-2.5(5) for
authorizer authority. Not later than May 1 of each year, the state board
shall make available information and guidelines for an applicant
described in IC 20-24-1-2.5(5) concerning the opportunity to apply for
chartering authority under this article. The application process must
require each applicant to submit an application that clearly explains or
presents the following elements:
(1) A written notification of intent to serve as a charter authorizer
in accordance with this article.
(2) The applicant's strategic vision for chartering.
(3) A plan to support the applicant's strategic vision described in
subdivision (2), including an explanation and evidence of the
applicant's budget and personnel capacity and commitment to
execute the duties of quality charter authorizing in accordance
with this article.
(4) A draft or preliminary outline of the request for proposals that
the applicant would, if approved by the state board under this
section, issue to solicit charter school applicants under
IC 20-24-3.
(5) A draft of the performance framework that the applicant
would, if approved by the state board under this section, use to
guide the establishment of a charter contract and for ongoing
oversight and evaluation of charter schools consistent with this
article.
(6) A draft of the applicant's renewal, revocation, and nonrenewal
processes.
(7) A statement of assurance that the applicant commits to serving
as a charter authorizer in fulfillment of the expectations, spirit,
and intent of this article, and that the applicant will fully adopt
standards of quality charter school authorizing in accordance with
section 1.5 of this chapter.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(g) Not later than July 1 of each year, the state board shall grant or
deny chartering authority to an applicant under subsection (f). The state
board shall make its decision on the merits of each applicant's proposal
and plans submitted under subsection (f).
(h) Within thirty (30) days of the state board's decision under
subsection (g), the state board shall execute a renewable authorizing
contract with an applicant that the state board has approved for
chartering authority. The initial term of each authorizing contract is six
(6) years. The authorizing contract must specify each approved
applicant's agreement to serve as a charter authorizer in accordance
with this article and shall specify additional performance terms based
on the applicant's proposal and plan for chartering. An approved
applicant may not commence charter authorizing without an
authorizing contract in effect.
(i) (e) The state board shall maintain on the state board's Internet
web site website the names of each authorizer approved by the state
board under this section.
(f) After June 30, 2026, the charter board, a state educational
institution, and the governing board of a nonprofit college or
university that provides a four (4) year educational program for
which it awards a baccalaureate or more advanced degree may
not:
(1) issue a new charter; or
(2) renew an existing charter upon the charter's expiration
under IC 20-24-4-1.
SECTION 5. IC 20-24-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.280-2013,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) An authorizer may grant a charter to an
organizer to operate a charter school under this article.
(b) After June 30, 2026, an authorizer may not grant a charter
to an organizer to establish and operate a charter school located in
Indiana. This subsection expires July 1, 2031.
SECTION 6. IC 20-24-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) An organizer may submit to the authorizer
a proposal to establish a charter school.
(b) A proposal must contain at least the following information:
(1) Identification of the organizer.
(2) A description of the organizer's organizational structure and
governance plan.
(3) The following information for the proposed charter school:
(A) Name.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(B) Purposes.
(C) Governance structure.
(D) Management structure.
(E) Educational mission goals.
(F) Curriculum and instructional methods.
(G) Methods of pupil assessment.
(H) Admission policy and criteria, subject to IC 20-24-5.
(I) School calendar.
(J) Age or grade range of students to be enrolled.
(K) A description of staff responsibilities.
(L) A description of the physical plant.
(M) Budget and financial plans.
(N) Personnel plan, including methods for selection, retention,
and compensation of employees.
(O) Transportation plan, subject to section 20 of this chapter.
(P) Discipline program, subject to IC 20-24-5.5.
(Q) Plan for compliance with any applicable desegregation
order.
(R) The date when the charter school is expected to:
(i) begin school operations; and
(ii) have students attending the charter school.
(S) The arrangement for providing teachers and other staff
with health insurance, retirement benefits, liability insurance,
and other benefits.
(T) Any other applications submitted to an authorizer in the
previous five (5) years.
(4) The manner in which the authorizer must conduct an annual
audit of the program operations of the charter school.
(c) In the case of a charter school proposal from an applicant that
currently operates one (1) or more charter schools in any state or
nation, the request for proposals shall additionally require the applicant
to provide evidence of past performance and current capacity for
growth.
(d) If the proposal described in subsection (a) concerns an existing
charter school overseen by a different authorizer than the authorizer to
which the organizer is submitting the proposal, the authorizer receiving
the proposal shall consult with the current authorizer before granting
approval of the proposal.
(e) This section does not waive, limit, or modify the provisions of:
(1) IC 20-29 in a charter school where the teachers have chosen
to organize under IC 20-29; or
(2) an existing collective bargaining agreement for noncertificated
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


employees (as defined in IC 20-29-2-11).
SECTION 7. IC 20-24-3-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.250-2017,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section applies to state educational
institutions described in IC 20-24-1-2.5(2). that:
(1) provide a four (4) year educational program for which
they award a baccalaureate or more advanced degree; and
(2) have authorized one (1) or more charters before July 1,
2026.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the ultimate responsibility
for choosing to authorize a charter school and responsibilities for
maintaining authorization rest with the university's board of trustees.
(c) The university's board of trustees shall assign authorization
authority and authorization responsibilities to another entity that
functions under the direction of the university's board. A decision made
under this subsection shall be communicated in writing to the
department.
(d) An entity created under subsection (c) is subject to IC 5-14-1.5
and IC 5-14-3.
(e) Before a university may authorize a charter school, the university
must conduct a public meeting with public notice in the school
corporation where the charter school will be located. If the location of
the proposed charter school has not been identified, the public hearing
must be held within the county where the proposed charter school
would be located.
(f) This section expires June 30, 2041.
SECTION 8. IC 20-24-3-14.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.127-2016,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.1. (a) This section applies to nonprofit colleges
and universities described in IC 20-24-1-2.5(5). that:
(1) provide a four (4) year educational program for which
they award a baccalaureate or more advanced degree; and
(2) have authorized one (1) or more charters before July 1,
2026.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the ultimate responsibility
for choosing to authorize and for maintaining authorization rests with
the nonprofit college's or university's board of trustees.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2017, the nonprofit college's or university's
board of trustees shall assign authorization authority and authorization
responsibilities to a separate legal entity that functions under the
direction of the nonprofit college's or university's board. A decision
made under this subsection shall be communicated in writing to the
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


department and the state board.
(d) An entity created under subsection (c) is subject to the
requirements of IC 5-14-1.5 and IC 5-14-3. Creation of an entity under
subsection (c) by a nonprofit college or university described in
IC 20-24-1-2.5(5) does not subject the nonprofit college or university
itself to the requirements of IC 5-14-1.5 and IC 5-14-3 unless otherwise
required by law.
(e) Before an entity created under subsection (c) may authorize a
charter school, the entity must conduct a public meeting with public
notice in the school corporation where the charter school will be
located. If the location of the proposed charter school has not been
identified, the public hearing must be held within the county where the
proposed charter school would be located.
(f) This section expires June 30, 2041.
SECTION 9. IC 20-24-3-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 201, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) This section applies to a
charter school that receives property tax revenue under any statute
referred to in IC 20-24-7-6.1 or IC 20-24-7-6.2.
(b) As used in this section, "executive" has the meaning set forth in
IC 36-1-2-5.
(c) The county executive of the county in which the charter school
organizer is incorporated shall appoint one (1) individual to serve as a
member of the charter school board.
(d) In the case of a charter school organizer that operates more than
one (1) charter school located in more than one (1) county, the county
executive of the county in which the charter school is incorporated
shall appoint the member under this section.
(e) The following may not be appointed to a governing board under
this section:
(1) An individual currently serving on the governing body of a
school corporation.
(2) An individual currently employed by a school corporation.
(f) A county executive may designate an individual who already
serves on the governing board of the charter school as the county
executive's appointee under subsection (c).
(g) This section expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 10. IC 20-24-3-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) This section does not apply
to:
(1) a virtual charter school; or
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(2) an adult high school.
(b) As used in this section, "charter school district" refers to the
school district within which the charter school building is located.
(c) Each charter school established or renewed after June 30,
2026, must provide transportation services to all students who
reside within the charter school's district in accordance with
IC 20-27, if the charter school receives property taxes under
IC 20-24-7-6.1 or IC 20-24-7-6.2.
SECTION 11. IC 20-24-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. A charter must meet the following
requirements:
(1) Be a written instrument.
(2) Be executed by an authorizer and an organizer.
(3) Confer certain rights, franchises, privileges, and obligations
on a charter school.
(4) Confirm the status of a charter school as a public school.
(5) Subject to subdivision (6)(E), be granted for:
(A) prior to July 1, 2026, not more than fifteen (15) years;
and
(B) after June 30, 2026, not more than five (5) years; and
(B) (C) a fixed number of years agreed to by the authorizer
and the organizer.
(6) Provide for the following:
(A) A review by the authorizer of the charter school's
performance, including the progress of the charter school in
achieving the academic goals set forth in the charter, at least
one (1) time in each five (5) year period while the charter is in
effect.
(B) Renewal, if the authorizer and the organizer agree to renew
the charter.
(C) The renewal application must include guidance from the
authorizer, and the guidance must include the performance
criteria that will guide the authorizer's renewal decisions.
(D) The renewal application process must, at a minimum,
provide an opportunity for the charter school to:
(i) present additional evidence, beyond the data contained in
the performance report, supporting its case for charter
renewal;
(ii) describe improvements undertaken or planned for the
charter school; and
(iii) detail the charter school's plans for the next charter
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


term.
(E) Not later than the end of the calendar year in which the
charter school seeks renewal of a charter, the governing board
of a charter school seeking renewal shall submit a renewal
application to the charter authorizer under the renewal
application guidance issued by the authorizer. The authorizer
shall make a final ruling on the renewal application not later
than April 1 after the filing of the renewal application.
(7) Specify the grounds for the authorizer to:
(A) revoke the charter before the end of the term for which the
charter is granted; or
(B) not renew a charter.
(8) Set forth the methods by which the charter school will be held
accountable for achieving the educational mission and goals of
the charter school, including the following:
(A) Evidence of improvement in:
(i) assessment measures, including the statewide assessment
program measures;
(ii) attendance rates;
(iii) graduation rates (if appropriate);
(iv) increased numbers of Indiana diplomas with a Core 40
designation or increased numbers of Indiana diploma
designations established under IC 20-19-2-21 and other
college and career ready indicators including advanced
placement participation and passage, dual credit
participation and passage, and International Baccalaureate
participation and passage (if appropriate);
(v) increased numbers of Indiana diplomas with Core 40
with academic honors and technical honors designations (if
appropriate);
(vi) student academic growth;
(vii) financial performance and stability; and
(viii) governing board performance and stewardship,
including compliance with applicable laws, rules and
regulations, and charter terms.
(B) Evidence of progress toward reaching the educational
goals set by the organizer.
(9) Describe the method to be used to monitor the charter
school's:
(A) compliance with applicable law; and
(B) performance in meeting targeted educational performance.
(10) Specify that the authorizer and the organizer may amend the
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


charter during the term of the charter by mutual consent and
describe the process for amending the charter.
(11) Describe specific operating requirements, including all the
matters set forth in the application for the charter.
(12) Specify a date when the charter school will:
(A) begin school operations; and
(B) have students attending the charter school.
(13) Specify that records of a charter school relating to the
school's operation and charter are subject to inspection and
copying to the same extent that records of a public school are
subject to inspection and copying under IC 5-14-3.
(14) Specify that records provided by the charter school to the
department or authorizer that relate to compliance by the
organizer with the terms of the charter or applicable state or
federal laws are subject to inspection and copying in accordance
with IC 5-14-3.
(15) Specify that the charter school is subject to the requirements
of IC 5-14-1.5.
(16) In the case of a charter school that is subject to
IC 20-24-3-19, the charter must confirm that at least one (1)
member of the governing board of the charter school will be
appointed in accordance with IC 20-24-3-19.
(17) Specify that the charter must require that at least:
(A) one (1) member of the governing board of the charter
school is a parent of a child enrolled in the charter school;
and
(B) one (1) member of the governing board of the charter
school is:
(i) a resident of the school district within which the
charter school is physically located; and
(ii) not a parent of a student enrolled at the charter
school.
This subsection expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 12. IC 20-24-6-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) Each charter school shall
adopt a plan for annual performance evaluations for each
certificated employee (as defined in IC 20-28-11.5-0.5). A charter
school shall implement the plan beginning with the 2026-2027
school year.
(b) The plan adopted under this section must include the
components listed in IC 20-28-11.5-4(c).
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


SECTION 13. IC 20-24-7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.221-2015,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Services that a school corporation provides
to a charter school, including transportation, may be provided at not
more than one hundred three percent (103%) of the actual cost of the
services.
(b) This subsection applies to an authorizer that is a state
educational institution described in IC 20-24-1-2.5(2).
IC 20-24-3-14(a). Except as provided in subsection (f), in a state fiscal
year, a state educational institution may receive from the organizer of
a charter school authorized by the state educational institution an
administrative fee equal to not more than three percent (3%) of the total
amount the organizer receives during the state fiscal year from basic
tuition support (as defined in IC 20-43-1-8).
(c) This subsection applies to the executive of a consolidated city
that authorizes a charter school. Except as provided in subsection (f),
in a state fiscal year, the executive may collect from the organizer of a
charter school authorized by the executive an administrative fee equal
to not more than three percent (3%) of the total amount the organizer
receives during the state fiscal year for basic tuition support.
(d) This subsection applies to an authorizer that is a nonprofit
college or university that is approved by the state board of education
before July 1, 2026. Except as provided in IC 20-24-2.2-1.5 and
subsection (f), in a state fiscal year, a private college or university may
collect from the organizer of a charter school authorized by the private
college or university an administrative fee equal to not more than three
percent (3%) of the total amount the organizer receives during the state
fiscal year for basic tuition support.
(e) This subsection applies to the charter board. Except as provided
in subsection (f), in a state fiscal year, the charter school board may
collect from the organizer of a charter school authorized by the charter
board an administrative fee equal to not more than three percent (3%)
of the total amount the organizer receives during the state fiscal year
for basic tuition support.
(f) This subsection applies to an adult high school. An authorizer
described in subsections (b) through (e) may collect an administrative
fee equal to not more than three percent (3%) of the total state
appropriation to the adult high school for a state fiscal year under
section 13.5 of this chapter.
(g) An authorizer's administrative fee may not include any costs
incurred in delivering services that a charter school may purchase at its
discretion from the authorizer. The authorizer shall use its funding
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


provided under this section exclusively for the purpose of fulfilling
authorizing obligations.
(h) Except for oversight services, a charter school may not be
required to purchase services from its authorizer as a condition of
charter approval or of executing a charter contract, nor may any such
condition be implied.
(i) A charter school may choose to purchase services from its
authorizer. In that event, the charter school and authorizer shall execute
an annual service contract, separate from the charter contract, stating
the parties' mutual agreement concerning the services to be provided
by the authorizer and any service fees to be charged to the charter
school. An authorizer may not charge more than market rates for
services provided to a charter school.
(j) Not later than ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year,
each authorizer shall provide to each charter school it authorizes an
itemized accounting of the actual costs of services purchased by the
charter school from the authorizer. Any difference between the amount
initially charged to the charter school and the actual cost shall be
reconciled and paid to the owed party. If either party disputes the
itemized accounting, any charges included in the accounting, or
charges to either party, either party may request a review by the
department. The requesting party shall pay the costs of the review.
SECTION 14. IC 20-24-7-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 131, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) With the approval of a
majority of the members of the governing body, a school corporation
may distribute a proportionate share of the school corporation's
operations fund to a charter school.
(b) A charter school may elect to distribute a proportionate share of
the charter school's operations fund to the school corporation in whose
district the charter school is located.
(c) A governing body may distribute money that is received as
part of a tax levy collected under IC 20-46-1 from the school
corporation's education fund to a charter school, excluding a
virtual charter school and adult high school, in the manner
provided by IC 20-46-1-8(d).
(d) A governing body may distribute money from the school
safety referendum tax levy fund to a charter school, excluding a
virtual charter school and adult high school, in the manner
prescribed by IC 20-46-9-6(d).
SECTION 15. IC 20-24-7-6.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 6.1. (a) This section applies to revenue collected:
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(1) after June 30, 2024, and before January 1, 2028, from a tax
levy imposed under IC 20-46-8 by the governing body of a school
corporation described in IC 20-46-8-11.2(a); and
(2) after December 31, 2027, in the case of a tax levy imposed
under IC 20-46-8 by the governing body of a school corporation.
(b) In calendar year 2025, 2026, and 2027, the county auditor shall
distribute money that is received as part of a tax levy collected under
IC 20-46-8 to an eligible charter school, excluding a virtual charter
school and adult high school, for deposit in the charter school's
operations fund created under IC 20-40-18-1. The distributions shall be
made at the same time that tax levy revenue is required to be
distributed to school corporations.
(c) Beginning in calendar year 2028, and each year thereafter, the
county auditor shall distribute money that is received as part of a tax
levy collected under IC 20-46-8 to an eligible charter school, excluding
a virtual charter school and adult high school, in the manner prescribed
by IC 20-46-8-12 for deposit in the charter school's operations fund
created under IC 20-40-18-1. The distributions shall be made at the
same time that tax levy revenue is required to be distributed to school
corporations.
SECTION 16. IC 20-24-7-6.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 205, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.2. (a) This section applies to a
levy
(1) resulting from a resolution to place a referendum on the ballot
adopted by the governing body under IC 20-46-1-8,
IC 20-46-1-8.5, IC 20-46-9-6, or IC 20-46-9-7 after May 10,
2023, and before July 1, 2026, for counties described in
IC 20-46-1-21(a) and IC 20-46-9-22(a). or
(2) if the:
(A) governing body of the school corporation approves the
referendum levy in a resolution adopted under IC 20-46-1-8 or
IC 20-46-1-8.5; and
(B) referendum levy is imposed for the first time with property
taxes first due and payable in a calendar year beginning after
December 31, 2027.
(b) The county auditor in the county in which the applicable school
corporation is located shall distribute money that is received as part of
a tax levy collected under IC 20-46-1 to an applicable charter school,
excluding a virtual charter school or adult high school, in the manner
provided by IC 20-46-1-21.
(c) The county auditor in the county in which the applicable school
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


corporation is located shall distribute money that is received as part of
a tax levy collected under IC 20-46-9 to an applicable charter school,
excluding a virtual charter school or adult high school, in the manner
prescribed by IC 20-46-9-22.
(d) A charter school that may receive money from a school
corporation's tax levy collected under IC 20-46-1 or a school safety
referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9 is prohibited from promoting a
referendum in the same manner as a school corporation is prohibited
from promoting a position on a referendum under IC 20-46-1-20.
(e) If a charter school receives a distribution from a school
corporation from the school corporation's tax levy collected under
IC 20-46-1 or a school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9,
the charter school must post the following on the charter school's
website:
(1) The specific purposes for which the revenue received from the
tax levy will be used.
(2) An estimate of the annual dollar amounts that will be
expended for each purpose described in subdivision (1).
(f) This section expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 17. IC 20-24-7-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 61, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) A virtual charter school may only apply for
authorization with any statewide authorizer in accordance with the
authorizer's guidelines. A virtual charter school may renew a charter
only with a statewide authorizer. An authorizer described in
IC 20-24-1-2.5(1) and IC 20-24-1-2.5(3) IC 20-24-1-2.5(2) is not
considered a statewide authorizer.
(b) For each state fiscal year, a virtual charter school is entitled to
receive funding in a month from the state in an amount equal to:
(1) the quotient of:
(A) the school's basic tuition support determined under
IC 20-43-6-3; divided by
(B) twelve (12); plus
(2) the total of any:
(A) special education grants under IC 20-43-7;
(B) career and technical education grants under IC 20-43-8;
(C) non-English speaking program grants under
IC 20-43-10-4; and
(D) academic performance grants under IC 20-43-10.5;
to which the virtual charter school is entitled for the month.
For each state fiscal year, a virtual charter school's special education
grants under IC 20-43-7 shall be calculated in the same manner as
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


special education grants are calculated for other school corporations.
(c) The state board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to govern the
operation of virtual charter schools.
(d) Each authorizer of a virtual charter school shall establish
requirements or guidelines for virtual charter schools authorized by the
authorizer that include the following:
(1) Minimum requirements for the mandatory annual onboarding
process and orientation required under IC 20-24-5-4.5, which
shall include a requirement that a virtual charter school must
provide to a parent of a student:
(A) the student engagement and attendance requirements or
policies of the virtual charter school; and
(B) notice that a person who knowingly or intentionally
deprives a dependent of education commits a violation under
IC 35-46-1-4.
(2) Requirements relating to tracking and monitoring student
participation and attendance.
(3) Ongoing student engagement and counseling policy
requirements.
(4) Employee policy requirements, including professional
development requirements.
(e) The department, with the approval of the state board, shall
before December 1 of each year submit an annual report to the budget
committee concerning the program under this section.
(f) Each school year, at least sixty percent (60%) of the students
who are enrolled in virtual charter schools under this section for the
first time must have been included in the state's fall count of ADM
conducted in the previous school year.
(g) Each virtual charter school shall report annually to the
department concerning the following, on a schedule determined by the
department:
(1) Classroom size.
(2) The ratio of teachers per classroom.
(3) The number of student-teacher meetings conducted in person
or by video conference.
(4) Any other information determined by the department.
The department shall provide this information annually to the state
board and the legislative council in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
(h) A virtual charter school shall adopt a student engagement policy.
A student who regularly fails to participate in courses may be
withdrawn from enrollment under policies adopted by the virtual
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


charter school. The policies adopted by the virtual charter school must
ensure that:
(1) adequate notice of the withdrawal is provided to the parent
and the student; and
(2) an opportunity is provided, before the withdrawal of the
student by the virtual charter school, for the student or the parent
to demonstrate that failure to participate in the course is due to an
event that would be considered an excused absence under
IC 20-33-2.
(i) A student who is withdrawn from enrollment for failure to
participate in courses pursuant to the school's student engagement
policy may not reenroll in that same virtual charter school for the
school year in which the student is withdrawn.
(j) An authorizer shall review and monitor whether a virtual charter
school that is authorized by the authorizer complies with the
requirements described in subsections (h) and (i).
SECTION 18. IC 20-24-7-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 206, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) This section is in addition
to any other requirement imposed on a charter school with respect to
the closure of a charter school, including the payment of any
outstanding debts.
(b) At the time of the closure of a charter school, the charter school
shall return any money remaining unexpended from any distribution of
property tax revenue received from a levy referred to in sections 6.1
(before its repeal) and 6.2 of this chapter to the school corporation that
made the distribution. A charter school that closes is not entitled to any
future distributions of property tax revenue from a levy referred to in
sections 6.1 (before its repeal) and 6.2 of this chapter. This
subsection expires December 31, 2036.
(c) If a charter school has outstanding debt at the time of the closure,
the charter school must satisfy the outstanding debt in accordance with
the following:
(1) If the charter school owns the building but did not purchase
the building under IC 20-26-7.1, the charter school must first sell
the building and apply the proceeds received from the sale to pay
off the outstanding debt.
(2) If subdivision (1) does not apply, the charter school must
satisfy the debt by means of any other revenue source legally
available to the charter school.
(d) A charter school that closes must notify the county auditor of the
county in which the charter school is located of the closure and provide
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


the county auditor with a copy of the:
(1) charter school authorizer's decision;
(2) charter school's governing body's vote determining; or
(3) minutes of the meeting at which the charter school's governing
body made the decision;
to close the charter school.
SECTION 19. IC 20-24-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 62, AND AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025, SECTION
132, AND AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS CORRECTED AND
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Sec. 5. The following statutes and rules and guidelines adopted under
the following statutes apply to a charter school:
(1) IC 5-11-1-9 (required audits by the state board of accounts).
(2) IC 5-14-3.7 (access to financial data for local schools).
(2) (3) IC 20-39-1-1 (unified accounting system).
(3) (4) IC 20-35 (special education).
(4) (5) IC 20-26-5-10 (criminal history).
(5) (6) IC 20-26-5-6 (subject to laws requiring regulation by state
agencies).
(6) (7) IC 20-28-10-12 (nondiscrimination for teacher marital
status).
(7) (8) IC 20-28-10-14 (teacher freedom of association).
(8) (9) IC 20-28-10-17 (school counselor immunity).
(9) (10) For conversion charter schools only if the conversion
charter school elects to collectively bargain under
IC 20-24-6-3(b), IC 20-28-6, IC 20-28-7.5, IC 20-28-8,
IC 20-28-9, and IC 20-28-10.
(10) (11) IC 20-33-2 (compulsory school attendance).
(11) (12) IC 20-33-8-19, IC 20-33-8-21, and IC 20-33-8-22
(student due process and judicial review).
(12) (13) IC 20-33-8-16 (firearms and deadly weapons).
(13) (14) (12) IC 20-34-3 (health and safety measures).
(14) (15) (13) IC 20-33-9 (reporting of student violations of law).
(15) (16) (14) IC 20-30-3-2 and IC 20-30-3-4 (patriotic
commemorative observances).
(16) (17) (15) IC 20-31-3, IC 20-32-4, IC 20-32-5 (for a school
year ending before July 1, 2018), IC 20-32-5.1, (for a school year
beginning after June 30, 2018), IC 20-32-8, and IC 20-32-8.5, as
provided in IC 20-32-8.5-2 (academic standards, accreditation,
assessment, and remediation). and assessment).
(17) (18) (16) IC 20-33-7 (parental access to education records).
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(18) (19) (17) IC 20-31 (accountability for school performance
and improvement).
(19) (20) (18) IC 20-30-5-19 (personal financial responsibility
instruction).
(20) (21) (19) IC 20-26-5-37.3, before its expiration (career and
technical education reporting).
(21) (22) (20) IC 20-35.5 (dyslexia screening and intervention).
(22) IC 22-2-18, before its expiration on June 30, 2021
(limitations on employment of minors).
(23) (21) IC 20-26-12-1 (curricular material purchase and
provision; public school students).
(24) (22) IC 20-26-12-2 (curricular material purchase and rental).
(23) IC 20-26-5-34.4 (child suicide awareness and prevention).
(24) IC 20-30 (curriculum).
(25) IC 20-33-8 (student discipline).
(26) IC 20-33-9-10.5 (criminal organization activity).
(27) IC 20-34-6 (student safety reporting).
(28) IC 20-40, as applicable (government funds and accounts).
SECTION 20. IC 20-24-9-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.216-2021,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section does not apply to the following:
(1) To an organizer that operates two (2) or more charter schools
unless all charter schools operated by the organizer are located
within the same county.
(2) To the organizer of a virtual charter school.
(3) To an innovation network school under IC 20-25.7.
(b) This section does not apply to a public meeting in which the
governing board participates in the public meeting by means of
electronic communication.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2021, 2026, the organizer of one (1) or more
charter schools that are located within the same county must:
(1) hold at least fifty percent (50%) of the public meetings of the
governing board of the charter schools within the county in which
the charter schools are located; and
(2) hold the public meetings of the governing board at which
the annual budgets of the charter schools are adopted within
the county in which the charter schools are located.
SECTION 21. IC 20-24-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 15. Charter School Funding
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 20-24-1 apply to this chapter.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


Sec. 2. This chapter applies to any charter school that enrolled
less than one hundred (100) students on the charter school's most
recent spring ADM count date under IC 20-43-4-3.
Sec. 3. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school
described in section 2 of this chapter is ineligible to receive:
(1) any state funding; or
(2) local property tax funding described in IC 20-46-1,
IC 20-46-8, or IC 20-46-9;
following the charter school's most recent spring ADM count date
in which the charter school enrolls less than one hundred (100)
students.
(b) The charter school shall provide notice of the most recent
spring ADM count date in which the charter school enrolls less
than one hundred (100) students and the charter school's
ineligibility for state funding to the organizer, the state board, and
the department of education not later than thirty (30) days after
the spring ADM count date.
Sec. 4. (a) A student enrolled in a charter school described in
section 2 of this chapter may elect to transfer to the public school
corporation within whose school district the charter school is
located.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a public school corporation
must accept a transfer request described in subsection (a).
Sec. 5. This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the
purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 22. IC 20-25.7-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 207, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) For as long as a charter
school remains a participating innovation network charter school:
(1) the school corporation may provide transportation for students
attending the participating innovation network charter school;
(2) the school corporation may maintain and repair the buildings
and grounds used by the participating innovation network charter
school consistent with the maintenance and repair to the school
corporation's other buildings and grounds;
(3) the school corporation may enter into an agreement to transfer
the ownership of a school corporation facility to the organizer;
and
(4) the school corporation may not alter the use of the facility
occupied by the participating innovation network charter school
without written agreement from the organizer.
(b) If an organizer contracts with a school corporation for goods or
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


services, the school corporation may not charge the organizer more for
the goods or services than the school corporation pays for the goods or
services. A school corporation may not require an organizer to contract
for specific goods or services provided by the school corporation or any
other entity.
(c) A school corporation and an organizer may negotiate to require
specific services with regard to a participating innovation network
charter school during the term of an agreement. However, an organizer
must be able to select the service provider for the services.
(d) For as long as a charter school remains a participating
innovation network charter school, the school corporation may
distribute money levied as property taxes to the charter school. Property
taxes distributed to a charter school must be used only for a purpose for
which the property taxes could have been used by the school
corporation. Property taxes distributed under this subsection may
supplement services and property provided under subsection (a) or (b).
The parties may jointly modify an agreement described in section 2 of
this chapter to implement this subsection.
(e) An agreement concerning the transfer of ownership of a school
corporation facility described in subsection (a) is not subject to
IC 20-26-7.1.
(f) Unless an agreement entered into before July 1, 2024, between
a board and an organizer provides otherwise, a school corporation may
not charge an organizer an amount for goods and services that is
greater than the amount of the operations fund property tax levy the
organizer receives under IC 20-46-8-11.2 or IC 20-46-8-12 for the
participating innovation network charter school.
SECTION 23. IC 20-26-5-34.4, AS ADDED BY P.L.254-2017,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 34.4. Each school corporation and charter school
shall adopt a policy addressing measures intended to increase child
suicide awareness and prevention. The policy must address the
following:
(1) Counseling services for the child and the child's family related
to suicide prevention.
(2) Availability of referral information for crisis intervention to
children, parents, and school corporation or charter school staff.
(3) Increasing awareness of the relationship between suicide and
drug and alcohol use.
(4) Training on warning signs and tendencies that may evidence
that a child is considering suicide.
(5) Availability of information concerning suicide prevention
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


services in the community.
(6) Cooperation among the school corporation or charter school
and suicide prevention services in the community.
(7) Development of a plan to assist survivors of attempted suicide
and to assist children and school corporation or charter school
staff in coping with an attempted suicide or death of a student or
school employee.
(8) Development of any other program or activity that is
appropriate.
SECTION 24. IC 20-26-7.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 209, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) For purposes of this section,
"charter school" does not include a virtual charter school or an adult
high school.
(b) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) A school building that since July 1, 2011, is leased or loaned
by the school corporation that owns the school building to another
entity, if the entity is not a building corporation or other entity that
is related in any way to, or created by, the school corporation or
the governing body.
(2) A school corporation to which all of the following apply:
(A) The county auditor distributes revenue after May 10, 2023,
as required under IC 20-46-1-21 or IC 20-46-1-22 (before its
repeal) to each eligible charter school.
(B) If the school corporation listed in IC 20-46-9-22 (before
its repeal) receives revenue from a school safety referendum
tax levy under IC 20-46-9, the county auditor distributes
revenue after May 10, 2023, as required under IC 20-46-9-22
(before its repeal) to each charter school described in
IC 20-46-9-22(b) (before its repeal).
The above subdivisions are intended to apply retroactively. No
referendums or distributed revenue prior to May 10, 2023, are
effective to provide exemption from this chapter. This
subdivision expires December 31, 2036.
(3) A school corporation to which all of the following apply:
(A) The school corporation approves a resolution after May
10, 2023, to impose an operating referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-1 after May 10, 2023, that includes sharing the
revenue from the referendum tax levy in the amounts
described in clause (B) with each charter school that:
(i) a student who resides within the attendance area of the
school corporation attends; and
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(ii) elects to participate in the referendum.
The above subdivisions are intended to apply retroactively. No
resolutions, referendums, or distributed revenue prior to May 10,
2023, are effective to provide exemption from this chapter.
(B) The amount of referendum tax levy revenue that the school
corporation is required to share with each charter school under
the resolution described in clause (A) is equal to the amount
determined applying the applicable formula under
IC 20-46-1-21 or IC 20-46-1-22.
(C) The referendum tax levy described in clause (A) is
approved by the voters.
(D) The school corporation distributes the amounts described
in clause (B) to each charter school described in clause (A).
(E) If the school corporation receives revenue from a school
safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, the school
corporation shares the revenue from the school safety
referendum tax levy with each charter school that:
(i) a student who resides within the attendance area of the
school corporation attends; and
(ii) elects to participate in the referendum;
in an amount equal to the amount determined applying the
formula under IC 20-46-9-22(d).
This subdivision expires December 31, 2036.
(4) A school corporation that receives property tax revenue
under any statute referred to in IC 20-24-7-6.1 (before its
repeal) or IC 20-24-7-6.2.
(c) In order for any payment to a charter school to qualify as sharing
of proceeds from a referendum for purposes of exemption from
IC 20-26-7.1, the referendum must have been passed with prior notice
to voters of all amounts of referendum proceeds to be paid to charter
schools. Any claim of exemption based on payment of proceeds from
a referendum passed without such notice is void. This subdivision
expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 25. IC 20-26-7.1-2.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. As used in this chapter, "interested person"
refers to the following:
(1) Each state educational institution.
(2) Each charter school in a county where a school corporation
with a covered school building subject to closure is located.
(3) All charter school authorizers. (excluding school corporation
authorizers as defined in IC 20-24-1-2.5(1)).
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(4) Each trade or professional organization representing charter
schools listed as an organization representing charter schools on
the website of the department or otherwise known to a school
corporation with a covered school building subject to closure.
(5) The Indiana charter school board.
(6) Each charter school that is not described in subdivision (2)
that has provided a written notice of interest in a covered school
building to the department.
SECTION 26. IC 20-27-1-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Except as otherwise provided, this article
applies to the following:
(1) School corporations.
(2) Nonpublic schools.
(3) Charter schools.
SECTION 27. IC 20-27-5-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a charter school
or a nonpublic school or to a school bus driver contract executed for
a charter school or a nonpublic school.
SECTION 28. IC 20-27-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.140-2012,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to:
(1) a nonpublic school or to a nonpublic school bus driver
contract executed for a nonpublic school; or
(2) a charter school or to a charter school bus driver contract
executed for a charter school; or
(2) (3) an educational service center (as defined by IC 20-20-1-2)
or a school bus driver contract executed for an educational service
center.
SECTION 29. IC 20-27-7-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The state police department shall annually
inspect all special purpose buses and school buses, including those
operated by a charter school or a nonpublic school to transport
students. The inspection of a school bus must determine whether the
school bus complies with the safety requirements prescribed for school
bus construction and equipment in the rules of the committee.
SECTION 30. IC 20-27-8-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. A school bus driver, including a school bus
driver who drives a bus for a charter school or a nonpublic school,
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


shall attend an annual safety meeting or workshop. A safety meeting or
workshop may not exceed two (2) days in any one (1) calendar year.
SECTION 31. IC 20-27-8-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 83, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) An individual who does not have at least
thirty (30) days experience in driving a school bus during the three (3)
year period immediately preceding the effective date of the individual's
assignment as a school bus driver for a public, charter, or nonpublic
school that is accredited by the state board within Indiana shall
satisfactorily complete a preservice school bus driver safety education
training course. The course may not exceed forty (40) hours.
(b) Course attendance must be completed:
(1) before the assignment of an individual required to take the
course as a school bus driver; or
(2) if immediate assignment is necessary, upon the completion of
the next scheduled course following the assignment.
(c) The secretary of education shall provide instructors, adequate
meeting facilities, registration forms, a uniform course of instruction,
and all other necessary materials for the preservice school bus driver
safety education meetings.
SECTION 32. IC 20-27-8-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2016,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The driver of a school bus for a public,
charter, or nonpublic school that is accredited by the state board shall
have in the school bus driver's possession, while transporting
passengers, a certificate that states the school bus driver has:
(1) enrolled in or completed a course in school bus driver safety
education as required under sections 9 and 10 of this chapter; or
(2) operated a school bus at least thirty (30) days during the three
(3) year period preceding the effective date of the school bus
driver's employment.
(b) A certificate of enrollment in or completion of the course or
courses in school bus driver safety education shall be prescribed by the
committee and completed by the designated representative of the
committee.
(c) A driver of a school bus who fails to complete the school bus
driver safety education course or courses, as required, shall be reported
by the person who conducted the course to the committee and to the
school corporation where the school bus driver is employed or under
contract.
(d) A driver of a school bus who fails to complete the school bus
driver safety education course or courses, as required, may not drive a
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


school bus within Indiana while transporting a student.
(e) The department may at any time order the revocation of a
driver's certificate of completion of the school bus driver safety
education training due to:
(1) fraudulent completion of the annual safety meeting or
workshop required under section 9 of this chapter; or
(2) circumstances endangering the safe transportation of students,
including the following:
(A) Permanent revocation for a:
(i) conviction for a felony or for a Class A misdemeanor that
endangers the safety or safe transportation of a student; or
(ii) positive drug or alcohol test result that does not fall
under the return to duty policy of the employing school
corporation.
(B) A two (2) year revocation for a conviction for a Class B
misdemeanor that endangers the safety or safe transportation
of a student.
(C) A one (1) year revocation for a:
(i) conviction for a Class C misdemeanor; or
(ii) judgment for a Class A infraction;
that endangers the safety or safe transportation of a student.
(D) A six (6) month revocation for a judgment for a Class B or
Class C infraction that endangers the safety or safe
transportation of a student.
SECTION 33. IC 20-27-9-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.99-2007,
SECTION 170, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This section does not apply
to the use of school buses owned and operated by:
(1) a nonpublic school; or
(2) a charter school; or
(2) (3) a nonprofit agency with primary responsibility for the
habilitation or rehabilitation of individuals with a developmental
or physical disability.
(b) Except as provided under sections 2 through 15 of this chapter,
a person may not operate or permit the operation of a school bus on a
highway in Indiana for a private purpose or a purpose other than
transportation of eligible students to and from school.
SECTION 34. IC 20-27-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.168-2022,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A special purpose bus or an appropriate
vehicle may be used:
(1) by a school corporation to provide regular transportation of a
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


student between one (1) school and another school or between the
student's residence and the school;
(2) to transport students and their supervisors, including coaches,
managers, and sponsors to athletic or other extracurricular school
activities and field trips;
(3) by a school corporation to provide transportation between an
individual's residence and the school for an individual enrolled in
a special program for the habilitation or rehabilitation of persons
with a developmental or physical disability, and, if applicable, the
individual's sibling;
(4) to transport homeless students under IC 20-27-12;
(5) by a school corporation to provide regular transportation of an
individual described in section 4 or 7 of this chapter between the
individual's residence and the school; and
(6) to transport students to career and technical education
programs under IC 20-27-12.1.
(b) The mileage limitation of section 3 of this chapter does not apply
to special purpose buses.
(c) The operator of a special purpose bus or appropriate vehicle
must be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, be authorized by the
school corporation, pass an expanded criminal history check and
expanded child protection index check as provided under
IC 20-26-5-10, and meet the following requirements:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) and in addition to the
license required under this subdivision, if the special purpose bus
has a capacity of less than sixteen (16) passengers, the operator
must hold a valid:
(A) operator's;
(B) chauffeur's;
(C) public passenger chauffeur's; or
(D) commercial driver's;
license.
(2) If the special purpose bus:
(A) has a capacity of more than fifteen (15) passengers; or
(B) is used to provide transportation to an individual described
in subsection (a)(3) or (a)(5);
the operator must meet the requirements for a school bus driver
set out in IC 20-27-8.
(d) A special purpose bus is not required to be constructed,
equipped, or painted as specified for school buses under this article or
by the rules of the committee.
(e) An owner or operator of a special purpose bus, other than a
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


special purpose bus owned or operated by a school corporation, a
charter school, or a nonpublic school, is subject to IC 8-2.1.
SECTION 35. IC 20-28-5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 117, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section applies when a
prosecuting attorney knows that a licensed employee of a public school,
a charter school, or a nonpublic school has been convicted of an
offense listed in subsection (c). The prosecuting attorney shall
immediately give written notice of the conviction to the following:
(1) The secretary of education.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), the:
(A) superintendent of the school corporation; that employs the
licensed employee or the
(B) equivalent authority if a nonpublic school employs the
licensed employee. of a charter school or nonpublic school;
that employs the licensed employee.
(3) The presiding officer of the governing body of the school
corporation that employs the licensed employee, if the convicted
licensed employee is the superintendent of the school corporation.
(b) The superintendent of a school corporation, presiding officer of
the governing body, equivalent authority of a charter school, or
equivalent authority for a nonpublic school shall immediately notify the
secretary of education when the individual knows that a current or
former licensed employee of the public school, charter school, or
nonpublic school has been convicted of an offense listed in subsection
(c), or when the governing body or equivalent authority for a charter
school or nonpublic school takes any final action in relation to an
employee who engaged in any offense listed in subsection (c).
(c) Except as provided in section 8.5 of this chapter, the department
shall permanently revoke the license of a person who is known by the
department to have been convicted of any of the following:
(1) The following felonies:
(A) A sex crime under IC 35-42-4 (including criminal deviate
conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal)).
(B) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(C) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3).
(D) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(E) Dealing in or manufacturing cocaine or a narcotic drug (IC
35-48-4-1).
(F) Dealing in methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.1).
(G) Manufacturing methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.2).
(H) Dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance (IC
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


35-48-4-2).
(I) Dealing in a schedule IV controlled substance (IC
35-48-4-3).
(J) Dealing in a schedule V controlled substance (IC
35-48-4-4).
(K) Dealing in a counterfeit substance (IC 35-48-4-5).
(L) Dealing in marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a
felony (IC 35-48-4-10).
(M) An offense under IC 35-48-4 involving the manufacture
or sale of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a
synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) under
IC 35-48-4-10.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019), a
controlled substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or
a substance represented to be a controlled substance (as
described in IC 35-48-4-4.6).
(N) Homicide (IC 35-42-1).
(O) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(P) Reckless homicide (IC 35-42-1-5).
(Q) Battery as any of the following:
(i) A Class A felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 2 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014).
(ii) A Class B felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 3 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014).
(iii) A Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014).
(R) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(S) Robbery (IC 35-42-5-1).
(T) Carjacking (IC 35-42-5-2) (before its repeal).
(U) Arson as a Class A felony or Class B felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or as a Level 2, Level 3, or
Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014) (IC
35-43-1-1(a)).
(V) Burglary as a Class A felony or Class B felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or as a Level 1, Level 2, Level
3, or Level 4 felony (for a crime committed after June 30,
2014) (IC 35-43-2-1).
(W) Human trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5).
(X) Dealing in a controlled substance resulting in death (IC
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


35-42-1-1.5).
(Y) Attempt under IC 35-41-5-1 to commit an offense listed in
this subsection.
(Z) Conspiracy under IC 35-41-5-2 to commit an offense listed
in this subsection.
(2) Public indecency (IC 35-45-4-1) committed:
(A) after June 30, 2003; or
(B) before July 1, 2003, if the person committed the offense
by, in a public place:
(i) engaging in sexual intercourse or other sexual conduct
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5);
(ii) appearing in a state of nudity with the intent to arouse
the sexual desires of the person or another person, or being
at least eighteen (18) years of age, with the intent to be seen
by a child less than sixteen (16) years of age; or
(iii) fondling the person's genitals or the genitals of another
person.
(d) The department shall permanently revoke the license of a person
who is known by the department to have been convicted of a federal
offense or an offense in another state that is comparable to a felony or
misdemeanor listed in subsection (c).
(e) A license may be suspended by the secretary of education as
specified in IC 20-28-7.5.
(f) The department shall develop a data base of information on
school corporation and charter school employees who have been
reported to the department under this section.
(g) Upon receipt of information from the office of judicial
administration in accordance with IC 33-24-6-3 concerning persons
convicted of an offense listed in subsection (c), the department shall:
(1) cross check the information received from the office of
judicial administration with information concerning licensed
teachers (as defined in IC 20-18-2-22(b)) maintained by the
department; and
(2) if a licensed teacher (as defined in IC 20-18-2-22(b)) has been
convicted of an offense described in subsection (c), revoke the
licensed teacher's license.
SECTION 36. IC 20-29-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.75-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. "Deficit financing" for a budget year:
(1) means, except as provided in subdivision (2), actual
expenditures exceeding the employer's current year actual
education fund revenue and, for a school employer for which the
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


voters have passed an operating referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-1 or a school safety referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-9, the amount of revenue certified by the department of
local government finance, excluding money required to be
distributed to a charter school under as a result of compliance
with IC 20-46-1-21 (before its expiration) or IC 20-46-9-22
(before its expiration); or
(2) means, in the case of any distressed school corporation, the
Gary Community School Corporation, or the Muncie Community
school corporation, actual expenditures plus additional payments
against any outstanding debt obligations exceeding the employer's
current year actual education fund revenue, and, for a school
employer for which the voters have passed an operating
referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1 or a school safety
referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, excluding money required
to be distributed to a charter school under as a result of
compliance with IC 20-46-1-21 (before its expiration) or
IC 20-46-9-22 (before its expiration), the amount of revenue
certified by the department of local government finance.
Except as provided in IC 20-29-6-3(c), revenue does not include money
estimated to be or actually transferred from the school corporation's
operations fund to its education fund. Revenue does not include money
allocated for supplemental payments in a resolution passed under
IC 20-29-6-3(d).
SECTION 37. IC 20-29-8-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) When a factfinder is requested or required
under IC 20-29-6, the board shall appoint a factfinder.
(b) The factfinder shall make an investigation and hold hearings as
the factfinder considers necessary in connection with a dispute.
(c) The factfinder:
(1) may restrict the factfinder's findings to those issues that the
factfinder determines significant;
(2) must restrict the findings to the items listed in IC 20-29-6-4;
and
(3) may not impose terms beyond those proposed by the parties in
their last, best offers.
(d) The factfinder may use evidence furnished to the factfinder by:
(1) the parties;
(2) the board;
(3) the board's staff; or
(4) any other state agency.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(e) The factfinder shall conduct the factfinding hearing in public in
a room or facility owned by the county or local unit of government
located in the county in which the school employer is located, or if the
school employer is located in more than one (1) county, in the county
in which the greatest number of students who attend the school
employer's schools reside. The public hearing may begin not earlier
than November 15 in the first year of the state budget biennium and
must be concluded by February 15 of the calendar year after the start
of formal collective bargaining.
(f) The factfinding process may not exceed thirty (30) days from
beginning to end, and not more than two (2) of those days may be used
for public testimony, which may be taken at the discretion of the
factfinder. During the public hearing, each party shall present fully its
last, best offer, including the fiscal rationale for the offer. Only
education fund revenue and, for a school employer for which the voters
have passed an operating referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1 or a
school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, the amount of
revenue certified by the department of local government finance,
excluding any money required to be distributed to a charter school
under as a result of compliance with IC 20-46-1-21 (before its
expiration) or IC 20-46-9-22 (before its expiration), may be
considered a source of the funding for items. Money estimated to be or
actually transferred from the school corporation's operations fund to its
education fund may not be considered a source of funding for items.
(g) The factfinder shall make a recommendation as to the settlement
of the disputes over which the factfinder has jurisdiction.
(h) The factfinder shall:
(1) make the investigation, hearing, and findings as expeditiously
as the circumstances permit; and
(2) deliver the findings to the parties and to the board.
(i) The board, after receiving the findings and recommendations,
may make additional findings and recommendations to the parties
based on information in:
(1) the report; or
(2) the board's own possession.
The board may not make any recommendations to the parties related to
any items not specifically identified in IC 20-29-6-4.
(j) At any time within five (5) days after the findings and
recommendations are delivered to the board, the board may make the
findings and recommendations of the factfinder and the board's
additional findings and recommendations, if any, available to the
public through news media and other means the board considers
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


effective.
(k) The board shall make the findings and recommendations
described in subsection (j) available to the public not later than ten (10)
days after the findings and recommendations are delivered to the board.
SECTION 38. IC 20-30-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2020,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This article applies only to the following:
(1) Public schools, including charter schools.
(2) State accredited nonpublic schools.
SECTION 39. IC 20-33-9-10.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2020,
SECTION 81, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) This section does not apply to a charter
school or a state accredited nonpublic school.
(b) A school employee shall report any incidence of suspected
criminal organization activity, criminal organization intimidation, or
criminal organization recruitment to the principal and the school safety
specialist, as applicable.
(c) The principal and the school safety specialist may take
appropriate action to maintain a safe and secure school environment,
including providing appropriate intervention services.
SECTION 40. IC 20-40-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 210, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The governing body of each
school corporation shall establish an education fund for the payment of
expenses that are allocated to student instruction and learning under
IC 20-42.5.
(b) The governing body of a charter school that receives a
distribution of revenue received from a tax levy under IC 20-46-8-11.2
or IC 20-46-8-12 (before its repeal) shall establish an education fund
for the payment of expenses that are allocated to student instruction
and learning under IC 20-42.5.
SECTION 41. IC 20-40-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 211, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Money in the fund may be
used for any lawful school expenses, including making a transfer to the
school corporation's education fund (IC 20-40-2) or operations fund (IC
20-40-18).
(b) A school corporation may distribute proceeds of a tax levy
collected under IC 20-46-1 that is transferred to the school
corporation's education fund to a charter school, excluding a
virtual charter school and adult high school, that is located within
the attendance area of the school corporation.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


SECTION 42. IC 20-40-18-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 212, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The governing body of each
school corporation shall create an operations fund to be used by the
school corporation after December 31, 2018.
(b) The governing body of each charter school that receives a
distribution of revenue received from a tax levy under IC 20-46-8-11.2
or IC 20-46-8-12 (before its repeal) shall create an operations fund to
be used by the charter school after December 31, 2024.
SECTION 43. IC 20-40-18-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 213, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The operations fund shall be
used to deposit the following after December 31, 2018, in the case of
a school corporation:
(1) Revenue from the school corporation's operations fund
property tax levy under IC 20-46-8.
(2) The sum of the following excise tax revenue received for
deposit in the fund in the calendar year in which the school year
begins:
(A) Financial institutions excise tax (IC 6-5.5).
(B) Motor vehicle excise taxes (IC 6-6-5).
(C) Commercial vehicle excise taxes (IC 6-6-5.5).
(D) Boat excise tax (IC 6-6-11).
(E) Aircraft license excise tax (IC 6-6-6.5).
(3) Transfers from the education fund (IC 20-40-2) or the
operating referendum tax levy fund (IC 20-40-3), if any.
(4) Allocations of local income taxes to the school corporation
under IC 6-3.6-6, if any.
(b) In the case of a charter school, the operations fund shall be used
to deposit amounts distributed to the charter school under
IC 20-46-8-11.2 or IC 20-46-8-12 after December 31, 2024.
SECTION 44. IC 20-40-18-10.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 214, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) This section applies only
to eligible charter schools that receive amounts distributed under
IC 20-46-8-11.2 or IC 20-46-8-12. (before its repeal).
(b) For purposes of this section, "charter board" means the
governing body of the organizer (as defined in IC 20-24-1-7) of an
eligible charter school.
(c) The operations fund may be used only to do the following:
(1) Carry out a capital projects plan under the following
conditions:
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(A) The plan must include all proposed expenditures that
exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and are for:
(i) capital assets; or
(ii) projects that are considered capital in nature, including
technology related projects.
(B) If a charter school wants to use money in the operations
fund during the year to pay for any items listed in clause (E)
that are considered capital in nature, the charter board must
approve a plan following a public hearing. The charter school
shall post the proposed plan or proposed amended plan on the
charter school's website before the hearing. The charter school
shall submit the proposed capital projects plan to the
department of local government finance's computer gateway
at least ten (10) days before the public hearing. The
department of local government finance shall make the
proposed plan available at least ten (10) days before the
hearing, through the department's computer gateway. If an
amendment to a capital projects plan is proposed, the charter
board must declare the nature of and need for the amendment
in the plan amendment.
(C) If a charter board adopts a plan under clause (B), the
charter school must then submit the plan to the department of
local government finance for inclusion on the department's
computer gateway not later than thirty (30) days after adoption
of the plan. The department of local government finance shall
immediately make the proposed plan available through the
gateway website.
(D) This clause applies to an amendment to a plan that is
required because of an emergency that results in costs that
exceed the amount accumulated in the fund for repair,
replacement, or site acquisition that is necessitated by an
emergency. The charter board is not required to comply with
clause (C). If the charter board determines that an emergency
exists, the governing body may adopt an amendment to the
plan. An amendment to a plan is not subject to the deadline
and procedures for adoption of a plan described in this
subdivision.
(E) This clause sets forth an exclusive list of the expenditures
that may be made from the operations fund under clause (B),
as set forth in the charter board's plan or amended plan.
Subject to the expenditures that are identified in the charter
school's plan or amended plan, the operations fund shall be
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


used for the following:
(i) Site acquisition.
(ii) Site development.
(iii) Building acquisition, construction, replacement,
renovation, remodeling, improvement, and maintenance,
including building materials and employment services.
(iv) Rental of real estate, buildings, facilities, and
equipment.
(v) To repair and replace buildings and to repair and replace
building fixtures that are owned or leased by the charter
school and of a type constituting loss capable of being
covered by casualty insurance.
(vi) Purchase, lease, repair, or maintenance of equipment,
including maintenance vehicles to be used by the charter
school. However, the fund may not be used to pay for the
purchase, lease, repair, or maintenance of vehicles that are
not maintenance vehicles, or equipment to be used primarily
for interscholastic or extracurricular activities.
(vii) Service contracts for janitorial and custodial services,
maintenance services, snow and ice removal services, trash
removal services, mowing and lawn care services, pest
control services, and any other routine services normally
required in the maintenance or upkeep of charter school
facilities.
(viii) Repair, replacement, or site acquisition that is
necessitated by an emergency.
(ix) Construction, repair, replacement, remodeling, or
maintenance of a school sports facility.
(x) Utilities.
(xi) Property and casualty insurance.
(xii) Purchase, lease, upgrade, maintenance, or repair
technology that will not be allocated to student instruction
and learning, to include computer hardware, computer
software, wiring and computer networks, and
communication access systems used to connect with
computer networks or electronic gateways; services of
full-time or part-time computer maintenance employees;
conducting nonrecurring inservice technology training of
school employees; implementing the technology preparation
curriculum; participating in a program to provide
educational technologies, including computers in the homes
of students (commonly referred to as "the buddy system
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


project") under IC 20-20-13-6, the 4R's technology program,
or any other program under the educational technology
program described in IC 20-20-13; and obtaining any
combination of equipment or services in the preceding two
(2) categories of this item.
(xiii) Services of charter school employees who perform
services considered to be a skilled trade by the United States
Department of Labor, Employment and Training
Administration. For purposes of this item, skilled trade
services do not include janitorial or comparable routine
services normally provided in the daily operation of school
facilities or equipment. Payment may be made for employee
services only if the employees perform construction of,
renovation of, remodeling of, repair of, or maintenance on
the facilities and equipment of the charter school.
(2) Pay transportation costs under the following conditions:
(A) A charter school shall use the operations fund to pay the
transportation costs attributable to transportation of school
children as specified in clause (B).
(B) Only the following costs are payable from the fund:
(i) Salaries paid to bus drivers, transportation supervisors,
mechanics and garage employees, clerks, and other
transportation related employees.
(ii) Contracted transportation services.
(iii) Wages of independent contractors.
(iv) Contracts with common carriers.
(v) Student fares.
(vi) Transportation related insurance.
(vii) Other expenses of operating the school corporation's
transportation service, including gasoline, lubricants, tires,
repairs, contracted repairs, parts, supplies, equipment, and
other related expenses.
(C) Percentages or parts of salaries of teaching personnel or
principals are not attributable to transportation. However, parts
of salaries of instructional aides who are assigned to assist
with the school transportation program are attributable to
transportation. The costs described in this clause (other than
instructional aide costs) may not be budgeted for payment or
paid from the fund.
(D) Costs for a calendar year are those costs attributable to
transportation for students during the school year ending in the
calendar year.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(3) Carry out a school bus replacement plan approved by the
charter school board under the following conditions:
(A) Before a charter school may use money in the operations
fund for replacing school buses, a resolution approving the
school bus replacement plan or amended plan must be
submitted to the department of local government finance.
(B) The department of local government finance shall
prescribe the format of the plan. A plan must apply to at least
the five (5) budget years immediately following the year the
plan is adopted and include at least an estimate for each year
to which it applies of the nature and amount of proposed
expenditures from the fund, and if the school corporation is
seeking to acquire or contract for transportation services that
will provide additional school buses or school buses with a
larger seating capacity as compared with the number and type
of school buses from the prior school year, evidence of a
demand for increased transportation services within the school
corporation. However, the evidence requirement regarding a
contract for transportation services does not apply if contracted
transportation services are not paid from the fund.
(C) If the charter school is seeking to require a contractor to
replace a school bus, evidence that the need exists for the
replacement of the school bus. This clause does not apply if
contracted transportation services are not paid from the
operations fund.
(D) Evidence that the charter school that seeks to acquire
additional school buses under this subdivision is acquiring or
contracting for the school buses only for the purposes
specified in clause (B) or for replacement purposes.
(E) If a charter school wants to use money in the operations
fund during the year to pay for school bus replacement, the
governing body must adopt a resolution approving the bus
replacement plan or amended plan. The charter school shall
post the proposed plan or proposed amended plan on the
charter school's website before the hearing. The governing
body must hold a hearing on the adoption of the plan. The
charter school shall submit the proposed school bus
replacement plan or amended plan to the department of local
government finance's computer gateway at least ten (10) days
before the hearing on the adoption of the plan. The department
of local government finance shall make the proposed plan
available to taxpayers, at least ten (10) days before the hearing,
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


through the department's computer gateway. If an amendment
to a bus replacement plan is being proposed, the charter school
must declare the nature of and the need for the amendment in
the resolution to adopt the amendment to the plan.
(4) Pay expenses that are allocated to overhead and operational
expenditures.
(5) Establish, maintain, and equip a public playground.
SECTION 45. IC 20-40-20-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Subject to subsections (c) and (d), money in
the fund may be used only for the following purposes:
(1) To employ or compensate a school resource officer or school
resource officers.
(2) To establish or fund a school safety office.
(3) To conduct a threat assessment of a school building.
(4) To create or update a school safety plan.
(5) To develop or update school emergency response systems.
(6) To purchase equipment to improve the safety of a school
building, school grounds, or school buses.
(7) To pay capital expenses to improve the safety of a school
building.
(8) To establish and administer programs to address youth
specific mental illness, addiction, anger management, bullying,
and school violence.
(9) To develop and administer professional development
programs for teachers, administrators, and other school employees
designed to improve school safety and reduce violence.
(b) Except as provided in IC 20-46-9-22 (before its expiration), a
school corporation may distribute, with the approval of the majority of
members of the governing body, a portion of the proceeds of a tax levy
collected under IC 20-46-9 that is deposited in the fund to a charter
school, excluding a virtual charter school, that is located within the
attendance area of the school corporation, to be used by the charter
school for the purposes described in subsection (a).
(c) Expenditures paid using money collected from the levy shall be
included in a school's safety plan.
(d) Local law enforcement shall participate in:
(1) development of a school safety plan;
(2) development or updates to school emergency response
systems; and
(3) determination of capital expenses that would improve the
safety of a school building.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(e) Money in the fund may be transferred to the school corporation's
education fund (IC 20-40-2), operations fund (IC 20-40-18), or school
safety referendum debt service fund (IC 20-40-21), as applicable, to
pay for expenditures listed in subsection (a).
SECTION 46. IC 20-46-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 215, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Subject to subsections (b),
(e), and (f) (c), (e), and (f) and this chapter, the governing body of a
school corporation may adopt a resolution to place a referendum under
this chapter on the ballot for any of the following purposes:
(1) The governing body of the school corporation determines that
it cannot, in a calendar year, carry out its public educational duty
unless it imposes a referendum tax levy under this chapter.
(2) The governing body of the school corporation determines that
a referendum tax levy under this chapter should be imposed to
replace property tax revenue that the school corporation will not
receive because of the application of the credit under
IC 6-1.1-20.6.
(3) The governing body makes the determination required
under subdivision (1) or (2) and determines to share a portion
of the referendum proceeds with a charter school, excluding
a virtual charter school and adult high school, in the manner
prescribed in subsection (d).
(b) A resolution for a referendum described in:
(1) section 21 of this chapter; or
(2) section 22 of this chapter;
shall specify that a portion of the proceeds collected from the proposed
levy will be distributed to applicable charter schools in the manner
described under this chapter.
(c) (b) The governing body of the school corporation shall certify a
copy of the resolution to place a referendum on the ballot to the
following:
(1) The department of local government finance, including:
(A) the language for the question required by section 10 of this
chapter, or in the case of a resolution to extend a referendum
levy certified to the department of local government finance
after March 15, 2016, section 10.1 of this chapter; and
(B) a copy of the revenue spending plan adopted under
subsection (f).
The governing body of the school corporation shall also provide
the county auditor's certification described in section 10(e) or
10.1(f) of this chapter, as applicable. The department of local
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


government finance shall post the values certified by the county
auditor to the department's website. The department shall review
the language for compliance with section 10 or 10.1 of this
chapter, whichever is applicable, and either approve or reject the
language. The department shall send its decision to the governing
body of the school corporation not more than ten (10) days after
the resolution is submitted to the department. If the language is
approved, the governing body of the school corporation shall
certify a copy of the resolution, including the language for the
question and the department's approval.
(2) The county fiscal body of each county in which the school
corporation is located (for informational purposes only).
(3) The circuit court clerk of each county in which the school
corporation is located.
(d) (c) If a school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9 has
been approved by the voters in a school corporation at any time in the
previous three (3) years, the school corporation may not:
(1) adopt a resolution to place a referendum under this chapter on
the ballot; or
(2) otherwise place a referendum under this chapter on the ballot.
(e) (d) This subsection applies to a resolution described in section
21 or 22 of this chapter. Not later than sixty (60) days before the
resolution is voted on by the governing body, the school corporation
shall contact the department to determine the following:
(1) In the case of a resolution described in section 22 of this
chapter, whether the school corporation is exempt from revenue
sharing requirements under section 22(a)(2) of this chapter. If the
school corporation is determined to be exempt, the department
shall notify the school corporation, and the school corporation is
not required to contact charter schools concerning participation
under subsection (h), shall exclude distributions to charter schools
under section 22 of this chapter, and shall exclude charter schools
from the projection described in this subsection.
(2) If the school corporation is not determined to be exempt from
revenue sharing requirements under subdivision (1), the number
of students in kindergarten through grade 12 who:
(A) (1) have legal settlement in the school corporation but
attend a charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or
adult high schools; and
(B) (2) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
Not later than ten (10) days after receiving the request, the department
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


shall provide the school corporation with the requested information,
which shall be disaggregated for each particular charter school. Subject
to subsection (h), the resolution shall include a projection of the
amount that the school corporation expects, based on the information
provided by the department under this subsection, to be distributed to
a particular charter school under section 21 or 22 of this chapter. This
subsection expires December 31, 2036.
(e) The resolution described in subsection (a) must indicate
whether proceeds in the school corporation's education fund
collected from a tax levy under this chapter will be used to provide
a distribution to a charter school or charter schools, excluding a
virtual charter school and adult high school, under IC 20-40-3-5 as
well as the amount that will be distributed to the particular charter
school or charter schools. A school corporation may request from
the designated charter school or charter schools any financial
documentation necessary to demonstrate the financial need of the
charter school or charter schools.
(f) As part of the resolution described in subsection (a), the
governing body of the school corporation shall adopt a revenue
spending plan for the proposed referendum tax levy that includes:
(1) an estimate of the amount of annual revenue expected to be
collected if a levy is imposed under this chapter;
(2) the specific purposes for which the revenue collected from a
levy imposed under this chapter will be used;
(3) an estimate of the annual dollar amounts that will be expended
for each purpose described in subdivision (2); and
(4) for a resolution for a referendum that is described in section
21 or 22 of this chapter, the projected revenue that shall be
distributed to charter schools. The revenue spending plan shall
also take into consideration deviations in the proposed revenue
spending plan if the actual charter school distributions exceed or
are lower than the projected charter school distributions described
in subsection (e). (d). The resolution shall include for each charter
school that elects to participate under subsection (h) information
described in subdivisions (1) through (3). This subdivision
expires December 31, 2036.
(g) A school corporation shall specify in its proposed budget the
school corporation's revenue spending plan adopted under subsection
(f) and annually present the revenue spending plan at its public hearing
on the proposed budget under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(h) This subsection applies to a resolution described in section 21
or 22 of this chapter. Except as provided in subsection (e), Not later
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


than forty-five (45) days before the resolution is voted on by the
governing body, the school corporation shall contact each charter
school disclosed by the department to the school corporation under
subsection (e) (d) to determine whether the charter school will
(1) in the case of a resolution described in section 21 of this
chapter, elect to participate or
(2) in the case of a resolution described in section 22 of this
chapter, elect to not participate;
in the referendum. The notice must include the total amount of the
school corporation's expected need, the corresponding estimate for that
amount divided by the number of students enrolled in the school
corporation, and the date on which the governing body of the school
corporation will vote on the resolution. Not later than thirty (30) days
prior to the date that the resolution is to be voted on by the governing
body, the charter school must respond in writing to the school
corporation and to the department, which may be by electronic mail,
and, in the case of the school corporation, addressed to the
superintendent of the school corporation. A charter school that elects
to not participate in the referendum may not subsequently change that
election during the term of the referendum. This subsection expires
December 31, 2036.
(i) If a charter school will not participate in the referendum, the
school corporation shall exclude distributions to the charter school
under this chapter and from the projection described in subsection (e).
(d). If a charter school will participate in the referendum, the charter
school:
(1) must be included in the projection described in subsection (e);
(d); and
(2) shall contribute a proportionate share of the cost to conduct
the referendum based on the total combined ADM of the school
corporation and any participating charter schools.
(j) This subsection applies to a resolution described in section 21 or
22 of this chapter. At least thirty (30) days before the referendum
submitted to the voters under this chapter is voted on by the public in
a general election, the school corporation that is pursuing the
referendum and any charter school that will participate under
subsection (h) shall post a referendum disclosure statement on each
school's respective website that contains the following information:
(1) The salaries by position within the school corporation or
charter school listed from highest salary to lowest salary and a
link to Gateway Indiana for access to individual salaries.
(2) An acknowledgment that the school corporation or charter
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


school is not committing any crime described in IC 35-44.1-1.
(3) A link to the school corporation's or charter school's most
recent state board of accounts audit on the state board of accounts'
website.
(4) The current enrollment of the school corporation or charter
school disaggregated by student group and race.
(5) The school corporation's or charter school's high school
graduation rate.
(6) The school corporation's or charter school's annual retention
rate for teachers for the previous five (5) years.
This subsection expires December 31, 2036.
(k) Not later than July 15, 2025, the department of education shall
prescribe the manner in which a projection described in subsection (e)
shall be calculated.
(l) (k) A charter school that begins operations after a resolution
under this section or section 8.5 of this chapter is voted on by the
governing body for a particular referendum may not receive an option
to elect to participate in that referendum during the term of that
referendum. This subsection expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 47. IC 20-46-1-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 216, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) A resolution to extend a
referendum levy must be:
(1) adopted by the governing body of a school corporation; and
(2) approved in a referendum under this chapter;
before December 31 of the final calendar year in which the school
corporation's previously approved referendum levy is imposed under
this chapter.
(b) For a resolution described in section 21 or 22 of this chapter that
is adopted under this section, the resolution must include the projected
charter school distributions described in section 8(e) of this chapter and
indicate the distributions to applicable charter schools in accordance
with this chapter.
SECTION 48. IC 20-46-1-19.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.5. (a) Subject to section 8(d) 8(c) of this
chapter, if a referendum is approved by the voters in a school
corporation under this chapter in a calendar year, another referendum
may not be placed on the ballot in the school corporation under this
chapter in the following calendar year.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and in
addition to the restriction specified in subsection (a), if a school
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


corporation imposes in a calendar year a referendum levy approved in
a referendum under this chapter, the school corporation may not
simultaneously impose in that calendar year more than one (1)
additional referendum levy approved in a subsequent referendum under
this chapter.
SECTION 49. IC 20-46-1-21, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 221, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) This section
(1) except as provided in subdivision (2), applies to revenue
received from a resolution that is approved before July 1, 2026,
by the governing body to impose a referendum levy under section
8 or 8.5 of this chapter after May 10, 2023, for a school
corporation located in:
(A) (1) Lake County;
(B) (2) Marion County;
(C) (3) St. Joseph County; or
(D) (4) Vanderburgh County;
through the full term of the referendum levy. and
(2) does not apply to revenue received from a referendum levy if:
(A) the governing body of the school corporation approves the
referendum levy in a resolution adopted under section 8 or 8.5
of this chapter; and
(B) the referendum levy is imposed for the first time with
property taxes first due and payable in a calendar year
beginning after December 31, 2027.
(b) Subject to subsections (f) and (h), the county auditor in the
county in which the school corporation is located shall distribute an
amount of revenue as provided under subsection (e) from the revenue
collected from a tax levy imposed under this chapter by a school
corporation that is attributable to the territory of the school corporation
that is located within the boundaries of a county listed in subsection
(a)(1) (a) to each charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or
adult high schools, that a student who resides within the attendance
area of the school corporation attends if the charter school elects to
participate in the referendum under section 8(h) of this chapter.
(c) The department shall provide the county auditor with data and
information necessary for the county auditor to determine:
(1) which charter schools are eligible to receive a distribution
under this section; and
(2) the number of students who:
(A) reside within the attendance area of the school corporation
who are included in the ADM for each charter school,
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


excluding virtual charter schools or adult high schools,
described in subdivision (1); and
(B) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
(d) The following schools are not eligible to receive a distribution
under this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(e) For the purposes of the calculations made in this subsection,
each eligible school that has entered into an agreement with a school
corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
separate from the school corporation. The amount that the county
auditor shall distribute to a charter school, excluding virtual charter
schools or adult high schools, under this section is the amount
determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools, that is eligible to receive a
distribution under this section, the number of students who reside
within the attendance area of the school corporation who are
currently included in the ADM of the charter school and receive
not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the current ADM count for the school corporation; plus
(B) total number of all students who reside within the
attendance area of the school corporation who are currently
included in the ADM of a charter school, and receive not more
than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools.
STEP THREE: Determine the result of:
(A) the STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount.
STEP FOUR: Determine the result of:
(A) the sum of:
(i) the STEP THREE amount; plus
(ii) any amount withheld in the previous year under
subsection (i); multiplied by
(B) the amount collected by the county auditor during the most
recent installment period that is attributable to the territory of
the school corporation that is located within the boundaries of
a county listed in subsection (a).
(f) A charter school is not eligible for a distribution under this
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


section from property tax revenue collected from a particular
referendum levy if the charter school does not have a certified fall
ADM count in the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year in which the public question for the referendum appears on the
ballot.
(g) Not later than August 15, 2025, and Not later than August 15 of
each calendar year, thereafter, the department shall provide to each
school corporation and eligible charter school an estimate of the
amount of property tax levy revenue the school corporation and charter
school are expected to receive under this section in the subsequent
calendar year based on the most recent fall ADM count.
(h) This subsection applies beginning with distributions of property
tax revenue under this section in 2026 and thereafter. In order to
receive a distribution under this section, the governing body of a
charter school shall, not later than October 15, 2025, and not later than
October 15 of each calendar year, thereafter, adopt a budget for the
current school year. Not later than ten (10) days before its adoption, the
budget must be fixed and presented to the charter board in a public
meeting in the county in which the charter school is incorporated. Not
later than November 1, 2025, and Not later than November 1 of each
calendar year, thereafter, the governing body of the charter school shall
submit:
(1) the budget that is adopted under this subsection;
(2) the dates on which each requirement under this subsection
were met; and
(3) a statement from the governing body of the charter school
attesting that the dates provided in subdivision (2) are true and
accurate and that the budget was properly adopted under this
subsection;
to the charter authorizer for review and to the department of local
government finance to be posted publicly on the computer gateway
under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(i) If a charter school does not satisfy the requirements of subsection
(h) to receive distributions under this section during a calendar year, as
determined by the department of local government finance, the charter
school may not receive a distribution of property tax revenue in that
calendar year and the county auditor shall withhold the charter school's
distribution amount. The department of local government finance's
determination of compliance consists only of a confirmation that the
adopted budget and attestation statement are submitted not later than
the applicable date under subsection (h). Any distribution amount
withheld under this subsection shall be:
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(1) added to the property tax revenue collections as described in
STEP TWO of subsection (e); and
(2) distributed among the school corporation and remaining
charter schools according to subsection (e);
in the calendar year that immediately follows the calendar year in
which the distribution amount was withheld.
(j) A resolution to extend a referendum levy to which this
section applies may not be:
(1) adopted by the governing body of a school corporation; or
(2) approved in a referendum under this chapter;
after June 30, 2026.
(k) This section expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 50. IC 20-46-1-22 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 22. (a) This section applies to revenue received from a
referendum levy if both of the following apply:
(1) The:
(A) governing body of the school corporation approves the
referendum levy in a resolution adopted under section 8 or 8.5
of this chapter; and
(B) resulting referendum levy is imposed for the first time with
property taxes first due and payable in a calendar year
beginning after December 31, 2027.
(2) The number of students who have legal settlement in the
school corporation but attend a charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools and adult high schools, and receive not more than
fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction is at least the greater of:
(A) one hundred (100) students; or
(B) two percent (2%) of the school corporation's spring ADM
count, excluding students who receive more than fifty percent
(50%) virtual instruction.
(b) As used in this section, "eligible charter school" means a charter
school attended by a student who:
(1) has legal settlement in a school corporation that imposes a
referendum levy under this chapter; and
(2) receives not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
However, the term does not include a virtual charter school or an adult
high school.
(c) The following schools are not eligible to receive, and may not be
considered in a calculation made for purposes of, a distribution under
this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(d) Subject to subsections (j) and (l), the county auditor in the
county in which the school corporation is located shall distribute to
each eligible charter school, in the manner provided under this section,
an amount of revenue received from a tax levy imposed by a school
corporation under this chapter unless the charter school elects to not
participate in the referendum under section 8(h) of this chapter.
(e) For the purposes of the calculations made in this section, each
eligible charter school that has entered into an agreement with a school
corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
separate from the school corporation.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2028, and not later than January 1 of
each year thereafter, the department, in consultation with the
department of local government finance, shall determine, for each
school corporation, the corresponding percentages of revenue received
from the tax levy that must be distributed among the school corporation
and each eligible charter school according to the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each eligible charter school, the
number of students who:
(A) have legal settlement within the school corporation;
(B) are currently included in the fall ADM count for the
charter school; and
(C) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the aggregate of the STEP ONE results for all eligible
charter schools with respect to the school corporation; plus
(B) the fall ADM count for the school corporation for students
receiving not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
STEP THREE: For each eligible charter school, determine the
result of:
(A) the applicable STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount;
expressed as a percentage.
STEP FOUR: Determine the sum of all the amounts computed
under STEP THREE and subtract the result from one hundred
percent (100%).
(g) The department shall provide to the county auditor, immediately
after calculation under subsection (g):
(1) each eligible charter school and the eligible charter school's
corresponding percentage calculated under STEP THREE of
subsection (f); and
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(2) the percentage calculated under STEP FOUR of subsection (f)
for the school corporation.
(h) Subject to subsections (k) and (m), when the county auditor
distributes property tax revenue, the county auditor shall distribute to
the school corporation and each eligible charter school the amount
determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine the amount collected in the most recent
installment period by the school corporation from the school
corporation's referendum levy imposed under this chapter.
STEP TWO: To determine the distribution for the school
corporation and each eligible charter school, determine the result
of:
(A) the sum of:
(i) the STEP ONE result; plus
(ii) any amount withheld in the previous year under
subsection (k); multiplied by
(B) the following percentage:
(i) In the case of an eligible charter school, the charter
school's percentage under STEP THREE of subsection (f).
(ii) In the case of the school corporation, the school
corporation's percentage under STEP FOUR of subsection
(f).
(i) Not later than August 15, 2027, and not later than August 15 of
each calendar year thereafter, the department shall provide to each
school corporation and each eligible charter school an estimate of the
amount of property tax levy revenue the school corporation and eligible
charter school are expected to receive under this section in the
subsequent calendar year based on the most recent fall ADM count.
(j) This subsection applies beginning with distributions of property
tax revenue under this section in 2028 and thereafter. In order to
receive a distribution under this section, the governing body of an
eligible charter school shall, not later than October 15, 2027, and not
later than October 15 of each calendar year thereafter, adopt a budget
for the current school year. Not later than ten (10) days before its
adoption, the budget must be fixed and presented to the charter board
in a public meeting in the county in which the eligible charter school
is incorporated. Not later than November 1, 2027, and not later than
November 1 of each calendar year thereafter, the governing body of the
charter school shall submit:
(1) the budget that is adopted under this subsection;
(2) the dates on which each requirement under this subsection
were met; and
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(3) a statement from the governing body of the charter school
attesting that the dates provided in subdivision (2) are true and
accurate and that the budget was properly adopted under this
subsection;
to the charter authorizer for review and to the department of local
government finance to be posted publicly on the computer gateway
under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(k) If an eligible charter school does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection (j) to receive distributions under this section during a
calendar year, as determined by the department of local government
finance, the eligible charter school may not receive a distribution of
property tax revenue in that calendar year and the county auditor shall
withhold the eligible charter school's distribution amount. The
department of local government finance's determination of compliance
consists only of a confirmation that the adopted budget and attestation
statement are submitted not later than the applicable date under
subsection (j). Any distribution amount withheld under this subsection
shall be:
(1) added to the property tax revenue collections as described in
STEP TWO of subsection (h); and
(2) distributed among the school corporation and eligible charter
schools according to subsection (h);
in the calendar year that immediately follows the calendar year in
which the distribution amount was withheld.
(l) A charter school is not eligible for a distribution under this
section from property tax revenue collected from a particular
referendum levy if the charter school does not have a certified fall
ADM count in the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year in which the public question for the referendum appears on the
ballot.
SECTION 51. IC 20-46-8-11.2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 11.2. (a) This section applies only to revenue collected
after June 30, 2024, and before January 1, 2028, from a tax levy
imposed under this chapter by a school corporation located in:
(1) Lake County;
(2) Marion County;
(3) St. Joseph County; or
(4) Vanderburgh County.
However, this section does not apply to, and distributions are not
required for, a school corporation that is designated as a distressed
political subdivision under IC 6-1.1-20.3.
(b) For distributions made in:
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(1) calendar year 2025, and subject to subsection (c); and
(2) calendar years 2026 and 2027, and subject to subsections (c),
(h), and (i);
the county auditor shall distribute to each charter school that is eligible
for a distribution under subsection (d), and as provided under
subsection (f), an amount of revenue received from a tax levy imposed
by a school corporation under this chapter that is attributable to the
territory of the school corporation that is located within the boundaries
of a county listed in subsection (a).
(c) The following schools are not eligible to receive a distribution
under this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(d) Not later than March 1, 2025, January 1, 2026, and January 1,
2027, the department, in consultation with the department of local
government finance, shall determine the corresponding percentages of
revenue received from the tax levy that are attributable to the territory
of the school corporation that is located within the boundaries of a
county listed in subsection (a) and must be distributed among the
school corporation and each eligible charter school according to the
following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine each charter school that:
(A) is located in the same county as the school corporation;
and
(B) provides not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction for its students.
STEP TWO: Determine, for each charter school described in
STEP ONE, the number of students who:
(A) have legal settlement within the school corporation;
(B) are currently included in the fall ADM for the charter
school; and
(C) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
STEP THREE: Determine the sum of:
(A) the aggregate of the STEP TWO results for all applicable
charter schools; plus
(B) the fall ADM count for the school corporation for students
receiving not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
STEP FOUR: For each charter school described in STEP ONE,
determine the result of:
(A) the applicable STEP TWO amount; divided by
(B) the STEP THREE amount;
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


expressed as a percentage.
STEP FIVE: Determine the sum of all the amounts computed
under STEP FOUR and subtract the result from one hundred
percent (100%).
(e) The department shall provide to the county auditor, immediately
after calculation under subsection (d):
(1) each charter school determined under STEP ONE of
subsection (d) and the charter school's corresponding percentage
calculated under STEP FOUR of subsection (d); and
(2) the percentage calculated under STEP FIVE of subsection (d)
for the school corporation.
(f) Subject to subsection (i), the county auditor shall distribute to the
school corporation and each applicable charter school the amount
determined, for each settlement period described in IC 6-1.1-27-1, in
the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: For each school corporation, determine a base
property tax levy amount calculated as:
(A) the sum of the school corporation's operations fund
property tax levies that are attributable to the territory of the
school corporation that is located within the boundaries of a
county listed in subsection (a) and collected under this chapter
for the applicable settlement period as described in
IC 6-1.1-27-1 in calendar years 2021, 2022, and 2023; divided
by
(B) three (3).
STEP TWO: For each school corporation, determine an
incremental property tax levy amount calculated as:
(A) the school corporation's operations fund property tax levy
collections that are attributable to the territory of the school
corporation that is located within the boundaries of a county
listed in subsection (a) for the applicable settlement period as
described in IC 6-1.1-27-1 in the current calendar year; minus
(B) the school corporation's base property tax levy collections
determined for the applicable settlement period as described
in IC 6-1.1-27-1 under STEP ONE.
STEP THREE: For the school corporation and each applicable
charter school, determine the result of:
(A) the sum of:
(i) the incremental amount determined under STEP TWO;
plus
(ii) any distribution amount withheld under subsection (i);
multiplied by
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(B) the following percentage:
(i) In the case of an applicable charter school, the charter
school's percentage under STEP FOUR of subsection (d).
(ii) In the case of the school corporation, the school
corporation's percentage under STEP FIVE of subsection
(d).
(g) Before August 15, 2025, and August 15, 2026, the department
shall provide to each school corporation and each eligible charter
school an estimate of the amount of property tax levy revenue the
school corporation and charter school are expected to receive under
this section based on the most recent fall ADM count.
(h) This subsection applies to distributions of property tax revenue
under this section in 2026 and 2027. In order to receive a distribution
under this section in 2026 and 2027, the governing body of an eligible
charter school shall, before October 15, 2025, and October 15, 2026,
adopt a budget for the current school year. Not later than ten (10) days
before its adoption, the budget must be fixed and presented to the
charter board in a public meeting in the county in which the charter
school is incorporated. A budget that is adopted under this subsection
must be submitted to the charter authorizer for review and to the
department of local government finance to be posted publicly on the
computer gateway under IC 6-1.1-17-3 not later than:
(1) to receive distributions in 2026, November 1, 2025; and
(2) to receive distributions in 2027, November 1, 2026.
In addition to the adopted budget, the governing body of the charter
school shall also submit to the charter authorizer, and to the department
of local government finance to be posted publicly on the computer
gateway under IC 6-1.1-17-3, the dates on which each requirement
under this subsection was met and a statement from the governing body
of the charter school attesting that those dates are true and accurate and
that the budget was properly adopted under this subsection.
(i) This subsection applies to distributions of property tax revenue
under this section in 2026 and 2027. If an eligible charter school does
not satisfy the requirements of subsection (h) to receive distributions
under this section during a calendar year, as determined by the
department of local government finance, the charter school may not
receive a distribution of property tax revenue in that calendar year and
the county auditor shall withhold the charter school's distribution
amount. The department of local government finance's determination
of compliance consists only of a confirmation that the adopted budget
and attestation statement are submitted not later than the applicable
date under subsection (h). Any distribution amount that must be
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


withheld from distribution to any particular charter school under this
subsection in:
(1) calendar year 2026 shall be added to the incremental amount
as described in STEP TWO of subsection (f) and distributed
among the school corporation and remaining charter schools
according to subsection (f) in calendar year 2027; and
(2) calendar year 2027 shall be added to the incremental amount
as described in STEP TWO of subsection (f) and distributed
among the school corporation and remaining charter schools
according to subsection (f) in calendar year 2027.
SECTION 52. IC 20-46-8-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 12. (a) This section applies to revenue collected after
December 31, 2027, from a tax levy imposed under this chapter only
if the number of students who have legal settlement in a school
corporation but attend a charter school, excluding virtual charter
schools and adult high schools, and receive not more than fifty percent
(50%) virtual instruction, is at least the greater of:
(1) one hundred (100) students; or
(2) two percent (2%) of the school corporation's spring ADM
count, excluding students who receive more than fifty percent
(50%) virtual instruction.
(b) As used in this section, "eligible charter school" means a charter
school attended by a student who:
(1) has legal settlement in a school corporation that imposes a tax
levy under this chapter; and
(2) receives not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
However, the term does not include a virtual charter school or an adult
high school.
(c) The following schools are not eligible to receive, and may not be
considered in a calculation made for purposes of, a distribution under
this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(d) Beginning in calendar year 2028, and in each calendar year
thereafter, and subject to subsection (j), the county auditor shall
distribute to each eligible charter school in the manner provided under
this section an amount of revenue received from a tax levy imposed by
a school corporation under this chapter.
(e) For the purposes of the calculations made in this section, each
eligible charter school that has entered into an agreement with a school
corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


separate from the school corporation.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2028, and not later than January 1 of
each year thereafter, the department, in consultation with the
department of local government finance, shall determine, for each
school corporation, the corresponding percentages of revenue received
from the tax levy that must be distributed among the school corporation
and each eligible charter school according to the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each eligible charter school, the
number of students who:
(A) have legal settlement within the school corporation;
(B) are currently included in the fall ADM count for the
charter school; and
(C) receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual
instruction.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the aggregate of the STEP ONE results for all eligible
charter schools with respect to the school corporation; plus
(B) the fall ADM count for the school corporation for students
receiving not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction.
STEP THREE: For each eligible charter school, determine the
result of:
(A) the applicable STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount;
expressed as a percentage.
STEP FOUR: Determine the sum of all the amounts computed
under STEP THREE and subtract the result from one hundred
percent (100%).
(g) The department shall provide to the county auditor, immediately
after calculation under subsection (f):
(1) each eligible charter school and the eligible charter school's
corresponding percentage calculated under STEP THREE of
subsection (f); and
(2) the percentage calculated under STEP FOUR of subsection (f)
for the school corporation.
(h) Subject to subsections (j) and (l), the county auditor shall
distribute to the school corporation and each eligible charter school the
amount determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine the amount collected in the most recent
installment period by the school corporation from the school
corporation's operations fund levy imposed under this chapter.
STEP TWO: To determine the distribution for the school
corporation and each eligible charter school, determine the result
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


of:
(A) the sum of:
(i) the STEP ONE result; plus
(ii) any amount withheld in the previous year under
subsection (k); multiplied by
(B) the following percentage:
(i) In the case of an eligible charter school, the charter
school's percentage under STEP THREE of subsection (f).
(ii) In the case of the school corporation, the school
corporation's percentage under STEP FOUR of subsection
(f).
(i) Not later than August 15, 2027, and not later than August 15 of
each calendar year thereafter, the department shall provide to each
school corporation and each eligible charter school an estimate of the
amount of property tax levy revenue the school corporation and eligible
charter school are expected to receive under this section in the
subsequent calendar year based on the most recent fall ADM count.
(j) Beginning with distributions of property tax revenue under this
section in 2028 and thereafter, in order to receive a distribution under
this section, the governing body of an eligible charter school shall, not
later than October 15, 2027, and not later than October 15 of each
calendar year thereafter, adopt a budget for the current school year. Not
later than ten (10) days before its adoption, the budget must be fixed
and presented to the charter board in a public meeting in the county in
which the eligible charter school is incorporated. Not later than
November 1, 2027, and not later than November 1 of each calendar
year thereafter, the governing body of the charter school shall submit:
(1) the budget that is adopted under this subsection;
(2) the dates on which each requirement under this subsection
was met; and
(3) a statement from the governing body of the charter school
attesting that the dates provided in subdivision (2) are true and
accurate and that the budget was properly adopted under this
subsection;
to the charter authorizer for review and to the department of local
government finance to be posted publicly on the computer gateway
under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(k) If an eligible charter school does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection (j) to receive distributions under this section during a
calendar year, as determined by the department of local government
finance, the eligible charter school may not receive a distribution of
property tax revenue in that calendar year and the county auditor shall
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


withhold the eligible charter school's distribution amount. The
department of local government finance's determination of compliance
consists only of a confirmation that the adopted budget and attestation
statement are submitted not later than the applicable date under
subsection (j). Any distribution amount withheld under this subsection
shall be:
(1) added to the property tax revenue collections as described in
STEP TWO of subsection (h); and
(2) distributed among the school corporation and remaining
eligible charter schools according to subsection (h);
in the calendar year that immediately follows the calendar year in
which the distribution amount was withheld.
(l) This subsection applies only to distributions under subsection (h)
in calendar years 2028, 2029, and 2030 to an eligible charter school.
Instead of the amount determined under subsection (h) for a
distribution to a particular eligible charter school from the revenue
collected from the tax levy imposed under this chapter by a particular
school corporation, the county auditor shall make distributions
according to the following:
(1) For a distribution in 2028, the county auditor shall distribute
an amount for a particular eligible charter school equal to:
(A) the applicable result of STEP TWO of subsection (h) for
the eligible charter school; multiplied by
(B) twenty-five hundredths (0.25).
(2) For a distribution in 2029, the county auditor shall distribute
an amount for a particular eligible charter school equal to:
(A) the applicable result of STEP TWO of subsection (h) for
the eligible charter school; multiplied by
(B) five-tenths (0.5).
(3) For a distribution in 2030, the county auditor shall distribute
an amount for a particular eligible charter school equal to:
(A) the applicable result of STEP TWO of subsection (h) for
the eligible charter school; multiplied by
(B) seventy-five hundredths (0.75).
Any amount of property tax revenue collected from the tax levy
imposed under this chapter by a particular school corporation that
remains after making the distributions according to this subsection
shall be distributed to the school corporation and are in addition to the
amount distributed to the school corporation under subsection (h) for
the applicable year. This subsection expires July 1, 2032.
SECTION 53. IC 20-46-9-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 227, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Subject to this chapter, the
governing body of a school corporation may adopt a resolution to place
a referendum under this chapter on the ballot if the governing body of
the school corporation determines that a referendum levy should be
imposed for measures to improve school safety as described in
IC 20-40-20-6(a) or IC 20-40-20-6(b).
(b) Except as provided in section 22 of this chapter (before its
expiration), a school corporation may, with the approval of the
majority of members of the governing body, distribute a portion of the
proceeds of a tax levy collected under this chapter that is deposited in
the fund to a charter school, excluding a virtual charter school, that is
located within the attendance area of the school corporation, to be used
by the charter school for the purposes described in IC 20-40-20-6(a).
(c) This subsection applies to a resolution described in subsection
(a) that is adopted after May 10, 2023, and before July 1, 2026, in a
county described in section 22(a) of this chapter. A resolution shall
specify that a portion of the proceeds of the proposed levy will be
distributed to applicable charter schools in the manner described under
section 22 of this chapter if the charter school voluntarily elects to
participate in the referendum in the manner described in subsection (i).
This subsection expires December 31, 2036.
(d) This subsection applies to a resolution described in subsection
(a) that is adopted after May 10, 2023, and before July 1, 2026, in a
county described in section 22(a) of this chapter. The resolution
described in subsection (a) shall include a projection of the amount that
the school corporation expects to be distributed to a particular charter
school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult high schools, under
section 22 of this chapter that elects to participate in the referendum
under subsection (i). At least sixty (60) days before the resolution
described in subsection (a) is voted on by the governing body, the
school corporation shall contact the department to determine the
number of students in kindergarten through grade 12 who have legal
settlement in the school corporation but attend a charter school,
excluding virtual charter schools or adult high schools, and who
receive not more than fifty percent (50%) virtual instruction. The
department shall provide the school corporation with the number of
students with legal settlement in the school corporation who attend a
charter school, which shall be disaggregated for each particular charter
school, excluding a virtual charter school or adult high school. The
projection may include an expected increase in charter schools during
the term the levy is imposed. The department of local government
finance shall prescribe the manner in which the projection shall be
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


calculated. The governing body shall take into consideration the
projection when adopting the revenue spending plan under subsection
(g). This subsection expires December 31, 2036.
(e) The governing body of the school corporation shall certify a
copy of the resolution to the following:
(1) The department of local government finance, including:
(A) the language for the question required by section 9 of this
chapter, or in the case of a resolution to extend a referendum
levy certified to the department of local government finance,
section 10 of this chapter; and
(B) a copy of the revenue spending plan adopted under
subsection (g).
The department of local government finance shall post the values
certified by the county auditor to the department's website. The
department shall review the language for compliance with section
9 or 10 of this chapter, whichever is applicable, and either
approve or reject the language. The department shall send its
decision to the governing body of the school corporation not more
than ten (10) days after the resolution is submitted to the
department. If the language is approved, the governing body of
the school corporation shall certify a copy of the resolution,
including the language for the question and the department's
approval.
(2) The county fiscal body of each county in which the school
corporation is located (for informational purposes only).
(3) The circuit court clerk of each county in which the school
corporation is located.
(f) Except as provided in section 22 of this chapter (before its
expiration), the resolution described in subsection (a) must indicate
whether proceeds in the school corporation's fund collected from a tax
levy under this chapter will be used to provide a distribution to a
charter school or charter schools, excluding a virtual charter school,
under IC 20-40-20-6(b) as well as the amount that will be distributed
to the particular charter school or charter schools. A school corporation
may request from the designated charter school or charter schools any
financial documentation necessary to demonstrate the financial need of
the charter school or charter schools.
(g) As part of the resolution described in subsection (a), the
governing body of the school corporation shall adopt a revenue
spending plan for the proposed referendum tax levy that includes:
(1) an estimate of the amount of annual revenue expected to be
collected if a levy is imposed under this chapter;
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


(2) the specific purposes described in IC 20-40-20-6 for which the
revenue collected from a levy imposed under this chapter will be
used;
(3) an estimate of the annual dollar amounts that will be expended
for each purpose described in subdivision (2); and
(4) for a resolution for a referendum that is adopted after May 10,
2023, and before July 1, 2026, for a county described in section
22(a) of this chapter, the projected revenue that shall be
distributed to charter schools as provided in subsection (d). The
revenue spending plan shall also take into consideration
deviations in the proposed revenue spending plan if the actual
charter school distributions exceed or are lower than the projected
charter school distributions described in subsection (d). The
resolution shall include for each charter school that elects to
participate under subsection (i) information described in
subdivisions (1) through (3). This subdivision expires December
31, 2036.
(h) A school corporation shall specify in its proposed budget the
school corporation's revenue spending plan adopted under subsection
(g) and annually present the revenue spending plan at its public hearing
on the proposed budget under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
(i) This subsection applies to a resolution described in subsection
(a) for a county described in section 22(a) of this chapter that is
adopted after May 10, 2023, and before July 1, 2026. At least
forty-five (45) days before the resolution described in subsection (a) is
voted on by the governing body, the school corporation shall contact
each charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult high
schools, disclosed by the department to the school corporation under
subsection (f) to determine whether the charter school will participate
in the referendum. The notice must include the total amount of the
school corporation's expected need, the corresponding estimate of that
amount divided by the number of students enrolled in the school
corporation, and the date on which the governing body of the school
corporation will vote on the resolution. The charter school must
respond in writing to the school corporation, which may be by
electronic mail addressed to the superintendent of the school
corporation, at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date that the
resolution described in subsection (a) is to be voted on by the
governing body. If the charter school elects to not participate in the
referendum, the school corporation may exclude distributions to the
charter school under section 22 of this chapter and from the projection
described in subsection (d). If the charter school elects to participate in
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


the referendum, the charter school may receive distributions under
section 22 of this chapter and must be included in the projection
described in subsection (d). In addition, a charter school that elects to
participate in the referendum under this subsection shall contribute a
proportionate share of the cost to conduct the referendum based on the
total combined ADM of the school corporation and any participating
charter schools. This subsection expires December 31, 2036.
(j) This subsection applies to a resolution described in subsection
(a) for a county described in section 22(a) of this chapter that is
adopted after May 10, 2023, and before July 1, 2026. At least thirty
(30) days before the referendum submitted to the voters under this
chapter is voted on by the public in a general election, the school
corporation that is pursuing the referendum and any charter school that
has elected to participate under subsection (i) shall post a referendum
disclosure statement on each school's respective website that contains
the following information:
(1) The salaries by position within the school corporation or
charter school listed from highest salary to lowest salary and a
link to Gateway Indiana for access to individual salaries.
(2) An acknowledgment that the school corporation or charter
school is not committing any crime described in IC 35-44.1-1.
(3) A link to the school corporation's or charter school's most
recent state board of accounts audit on the state board of accounts'
website.
(4) The current enrollment of the school corporation or charter
school disaggregated by student group and race.
(5) The school corporation's or charter school's high school
graduation rate.
(6) The school corporation's or charter school's annual retention
rate for teachers for the previous five (5) years.
This subsection expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 54. IC 20-46-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) A resolution to extend a referendum levy
must be:
(1) adopted by the governing body of a school corporation; and
(2) approved in a referendum under this chapter;
before December 31 of the final calendar year in which the school
corporation's previously approved referendum levy is imposed under
this chapter.
(b) For a resolution adopted under this section after May 10, 2023,
for a county described in section 22(a) of this chapter, the resolution
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


must include the projected charter school distributions described in
section 6(d) of this chapter and indicate the distributions to applicable
charter schools in accordance with section 22 of this chapter.
SECTION 55. IC 20-46-9-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 232, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) This section
(1) applies to revenue received from a resolution that is approved
by the governing body to impose a referendum levy under section
6 or 7 of this chapter after May 10, 2023, and before July 1,
2026, for a school corporation located in:
(A) (1) Lake County;
(B) (2) Marion County;
(C) (3) St. Joseph County; or
(D) (4) Vanderburgh County;
through the full term of the referendum levy. and
(2) does not apply to revenue received from a referendum levy if:
(A) the governing body of the school corporation approves the
referendum levy in a resolution adopted under section 6 or 7
of this chapter; and
(B) the referendum levy is imposed for the first time with
property taxes first due and payable in a calendar year
beginning after December 31, 2027.
(b) The county auditor shall distribute an amount under subsection
(d) to each charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult
high schools, that a student who resides within the attendance area of
the school corporation attends if the charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools, elects to participate in the
referendum under section 6(i) of this chapter. The department shall
provide the county auditor with data and information necessary for the
county auditor to determine:
(1) which charter schools, excluding virtual charter schools or
adult high schools, are eligible to receive a distribution under this
section; and
(2) the number of all students who reside within the attendance
area of the school corporation who are included in the ADM for
each charter school, excluding virtual charter schools or adult
high schools, described in subdivision (1).
(c) The following schools are not eligible to receive a distribution
under this section:
(1) A virtual charter school.
(2) An adult high school.
(d) For the purposes of the calculations made in this subsection,
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


each eligible school that has entered into an agreement with a school
corporation to participate as a participating innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 is considered to have an ADM that is
separate from the school corporation. The amount that the county
auditor shall distribute to a charter school, excluding virtual charter
schools or adult high schools, under this section is the amount
determined in the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine, for each charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools, that is eligible to receive a
distribution under this section, the number of students who reside
within the attendance area of the school corporation who are
currently included in the ADM of the charter school.
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of:
(A) the current ADM count for the school corporation; plus
(B) the total number of students who reside within the
attendance area of the school corporation who are currently
included in the ADM of a charter school, excluding virtual
charter schools or adult high schools.
STEP THREE: Determine the result of:
(A) the STEP ONE amount; divided by
(B) the STEP TWO amount.
STEP FOUR: Determine the result of:
(A) the STEP THREE amount; multiplied by
(B) the amount collected by the county auditor during the most
recent installment period.
(e) If a charter school receives a distribution under this section, the
distribution may be used only for the purposes described in
IC 20-40-20-6(a).
(f) A resolution to extend a referendum levy to which this
section applies may not be:
(1) adopted by the governing body of a school corporation; or
(2) approved in a referendum under this chapter;
after June 30, 2026.
(g) This section expires December 31, 2036.
SECTION 56. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Beginning July 1,
2026, the county auditor:
(1) shall distribute money that is received after June 30, 2026,
as part of a tax levy collected under IC 20-46-8 to the
applicable school corporations; and
(2) may not distribute money that is received after June 30,
2026, as part of the tax levy collected under IC 20-46-8 to
charter schools as provided in IC 20-46-8-11.2, as repealed by
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143


this act.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
2026 IN 86—LS 6438/DI 143